Authors
Brian Matherly
Number of Reviews
29

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
Cast: Ben Stiller, Edward Norton, Jenna Elfman, Eli Wallach, Anne
Bancroft, Brian George, Ron Rifkin, Milos Forman, Rena Sofer, Holland
Taylor 
Written by: Stuart Blumberg 
Directed by: Edward Norton 
Running Time: 128 minutes 
Barring the obvious comparisons to any jokes, priest Brian (Edward
Norton, making his directorial debut), and rabbi Jacob (Ben Stiller),
both fall for their grade school chum Anna Reilly (Jenna Elfman) when
she blows into town on a business trip.  Brian believes Anna has fallen
in love with him over the course of the few weeks she's been in town
when in truth, she has actually started seeing Jacob.  Jacob is happy
with their noncommittal relationship at first, but when Anna starts to
get serious, he begins to have doubts about what his parishioners and
mother will think about his relationship with a non-Jewish girl.  Can
Brian forgive Jacob for lying to him about the relationship he has been
in?  Can Anna forgive Jacob for placing his career above their
relationship?  Will Jacob's congregation and mother understand and
accept that he's in love with a gentile? 
Every once and a while, a film somehow manages to capture my frame of
mind perfectly and for the entire running length of said film, I am
completely in tune with the message being conveyed.  Keeping the Faith
was just such a movie (Instinct is another good example of one). 
Although I'm not personally embroiled in a struggle over a girl with a
friend of mine, I was somehow able to relate to all of these characters'
struggles in my own personal way.  I won't bore anyone with the details
but suffice to say, the theme of choice is a major one in the film and I
have been faced with several MAJOR life altering choices of my own in
the last two months. 
The performances are remarkably solid in this film.  Edward Norton has
quickly become one of my favorite actors (and certainly one of the best
of the newer crop) and here he certainly doesn't disappoint, even
getting to show off a little bit of his slapstick ability.  The scene
where Anna and Jacob's relationship is revealed to Norton's character is
utterly amazing, and really shows off his ability as an actor.  Ben
Stiller is always reliable as a comedic actor and here it is no
different, but we also get a chance to see his rare dramatic side (which
oddly still contains a hint of comedy).  The always gorgeous Jenna
Elfman gets a chance to shine as well, with a deftly balanced role as
the hard edged business woman that still remembers her childhood hanging
out with the guys and longs to rekindle that spirit again.  All three
actors share such a camaraderie and natural chemistry in this film that
it almost seems as if they did spend their childhoods together. 
The supporting cast turns in pretty decent performances as well.  Eli
Wallach plays the understanding mentor to Stiller's rabbi Jacob
character, Lisa Edelstien plays the rough and tumble date that Jacob has
been set up on (most of the scenes of which are shown in the trailer,
but all of which occur fairly early on in the film), Anne Bancroft is
perfect as Jacob's understanding but imperfect mother, and Ron Rifkin
(the heavy in films like The Negotiator and, to a lesser extent, Boiler
Room) plays the head of a board of rabbis that will either make or break
Jacob's career in the synagogue.  Perhaps the biggest surprise comes
from the appearance of director Milos Forman (who directed Norton in The
People vs. Larry Flynt) as a wise priest who teaches Brian to decide
what's best for himself and his faith.  
Despite the romantic comedy clichés Keeping the Faith seems trapped in,
the screenplay remains fairly intelligent.  None of the emotions seem
forced, and the comedy certainly doesn't (despite a pretty awful joke
towards the end of the film involving a woman's comment about
confessions "these days").  Although it may date the film in the long
run, it is also very topical.  There are several in-jokes about recent
films (released within the last five years) and countless other modern
pop culture references scattered throughout.  
I found Keeping the Faith to be an extremely good film.  Who knows,
depending on the way things turn out in the next few years I may look
back on this movie and feel totally different about it.  For now though,
I find it to be incredibly charming and intelligent, and for once I
actually agree with everyone who says it would make a good date film. 
[PG-13]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Fantasia/2000 (1999)
Hosted by: Penn Jillette, James Earl Jones, Quincy Jones, Angela
Lansbury, James Levine, Steve Martin, Bette Midler, Itzhak Perlman,
Leopold Stokowski, Deems Taylor, Teller
Written by: Hans Christian Andersen, Don Hahn, Irene Mecchi, David
Reynolds
Directed by: James Algar, Gaetan Brizzi, Paul Brizzi, Hendel Butoy,
Francis Glebas, Eric Goldberg, Don Hahn, Pixote Hunt 
Running Time: 75 minutes 
When I initially set out to review this film, my tag line was going to
be "You too can believe whales can fly".  Then it was going to be "You
too can believe pastel triangles can fly".  THEN, it was going to be
"You too can believe wood sprites can fly".  Finally, I just gave up
trying to come up with a tag line and decided to say... there's a lot of
flying going on in this film! 
As our first host Steve Martin tells us, the original concept behind
Fantasia was to bring it out every year with some old segments retained
and some new segments added in.  Well apparently that plan fell by the
wayside for a while, because approximately sixty years have passed since
the original classic was released.  Part of this might have something to
do with the cold reception the film got when it was first released in
1940 (grossing somewhere close to $110,000 in its original month of
release).  Subsequent re-releases of the film have elevated the
popularity of the film to the classic status it has finally achieved
(and rightfully deserved). 
To celebrate the release of an updated version of Fantasia, Disney and
IMAX teamed up to present the animated film in a fashion no one had seen
before: six stories high.  In an exclusive four month engagement (from
January 1st to April 30th, 2000), Fantasia 2000 can be seen at many IMAX
theaters across the US.  After the engagement is over, the film will be
shown at regular theaters.  Is the format effective for the film?  With
a few exceptions, yes.
The first segment we are presented with is set to Beethoven's Fifth
Symphony.  It's hard to describe exactly what this segment is about, but
it involves a bunch of brightly colored butterfly looking triangles
flitting about happily.  Everything seems to be going great for these
little things until the ground erupts with swarms of evil, black
bat-like triangles that attack and engulf their lighter counterparts. 
Eventually, shafts of light from above help drive away the evil bat-like
things and peace returns to the butterfly things.  Though this segment
isn't very story driven, some of the images are very visually strong,
especially the scene in which the dark cloud of bat things (who are all
outlined in blood red colors) begin to overtake the skies. 
The next segment is set to Ottorino Respighi's "The Pines of Rome".  In
this segment, some humpback whales swim happily through the ocean and
eventually emerge from the water and fly around the massive icebergs
that pepper the oceanscape.  A whale calf gets into a scuffle with some
nearby birds during the flight and ends up getting trapped in a giant
iceberg he smashes into while trying to avoid the birds attack.  He is
finally saved (by another liberating shaft of light) and he and his
brethren take to the skies and fly into the upper atmosphere where they
frolic in the "oceans" of clouds.  Again, visuals are the key with this
segment, especially where the whales are involved.  Reportedly the
whales, as viewed on an Imax screen in certain sequences, are shown as
actual size. The CGI whales look incredibly life-like, except for some
googly cartoon eyes drawn onto the images.  One especially striking
image involves the giant shadow of one of the whales being cast through
the wall of an iceberg as the whale calf tries to find a way out to its
parent.  Absolutely beautiful stuff. 
The third segment (and the least of the eight segments) is set to George
Gershwin's "Rhapsody in Blue".  This segment is designed as a tribute to
acclaimed caricaturist Al Hirschfeld, and intertwines four different
stories about sad souls living in depression era New York.  There's a
construction worker who dreams of being a jazz drummer, an out-of-work
sad sack that dreams of having a job, a young girl that dreams of
spending time with her parents instead of being hustled off by a
schoolmarm, and a nebbish who dreams of being free from his overbearing
wife.  I won't go into how everything works out, but in fine Disney
tradition there is a happy ending.  Unfortunately, the story drags quite
a bit and the seems out of place within the hyper reality of the rest of
the segments. 
Segment four is set to Dmitri Shostakovich's "Piano Concerto No. 2" and
is an animated version of Hans Christian Andersen's "The Steadfast Tin
Soldier".  A one legged toy tin soldier falls in love with a wind-up
clock ballerina (whom he assumes is also one legged because he can't see
her other leg extended out behind her), much to the dismay of an evil
jack-in-the-box jester.  The jester knocks the soldier out of a window
and continues pursuing the ballerina.  Little does the jester know, the
soldier has been deposited in the sewer and has journeyed through the
pipelines only to be swallowed by a fish that has been captured and sold
to the owner of the set of tin soldiers that the one legged one comes
from.  The soldier eventually saves the day and gets the girl.  Although
the ending has been altered from the Andersen story, "The Steadfast Tin
Soldier" is decently told with in the framework of a seven minute
short.  Some children may find the jester to be a little frightening,
but otherwise the segment is well made. 
Segment five is the funniest of the bunch.  Set to Camille Saint-Saens 
"The Carnival of the Animals", this segment features a flamingo
torturing his fellow flamingos with a yo-yo while they are trying to
perform a choreographed dance number. While it is the shortest clip of
the group and a throwback to the alligators and hippos dancing in the
first Fantasia, it is still well accomplished and a welcome bit of
comedy. 
Segment six is the only segment to be repeated from the original 1940
Fantasia, and it's the one that people remember most, "The Sorcerer's
Apprentice".  The story is the most recognizable, so the draw here is
seeing it on the enormous IMAX screen in remastered stereo. 
Unfortunately, the segment wasn't made to be presented on large format
film (considering it was shot full frame) and exhibits large amounts of
grain.  There were at least two occasions where images were very hard to
make out due to the excessive grain.  Similar problems crop up on modern
day releases when projected on screens too large for the image to be
shown accurately (but no one seems to notice for some strange reason),
an anomaly common to many 18-plus screen theaters. 
Segment seven is set to Sir Edward Elgar's "Pomp and Circumstance March
No. 1" and is the only other Fantasia segment to feature a stock Disney
character.  Donald Duck "stars" as an assistant to Noah, whose task is
loading all of the animals onto the Ark.  During the loading, Donald and
his wife lose sight of each other and both believe that the other one
didn't make it on the boat.  They are constantly missing each other due
to comic misadventures mainly involving Donald being crushed by animals
in various manners.  Despite the slapstick style of comedy in this
piece, it displays more emotion in its final scene than many of the
tear-jerkers foisted on audiences these days.  Powerful stuff. 
Segment eight brings a whole new meaning to the cliché "saving the best
for last".  Set to Igor Stravinsky's "The Firebird", an elk awakens a
forest sprite that proceeds to change the wintery landscape into a
beautiful springtime landscape.  Trees bloom and flowers blossom and
everything seems to be going well until the sprite becomes inquisitive
about a large mountain housing a strange formation.  When the sprite
examines the formation, it awakens and becomes the titular firebird.  In
a stunning spectacle, the firebird rears back and unleashes and fire
storm that destroys everything in its path, including everything that
the sprite has worked to create.  Some amazing animation is present
here, and well worth the ten dollars a ticket alone (although brush
strokes are evident in one scene due to the enlargement of the film). 
The host segments are largely (no pun intended) throwaways, although
Steve Martin's clip is pretty funny.  Be sure to stay through the
credits for a little more humor from Martin.  Penn and Teller are
usually funny, but here their gags seem routine and therefore
uninteresting.  The best segment comes from, of all people, Bette
Midler, who gets to tell us about some of the abandoned segments that
never made it off of the drawing board.  Pieces like Flight of the
Bumblebee, a take on the Four Horsemen set to Wagner's "Ride of the
Valkyries", and a strange segment prepared in the '40s by Salvador Dali
that never was shown are all previewed here and teased that they may
appear in future installments. 
For fans of visual stimulation or classical music, Fantasia 2000 is a
perfect way to spend the afternoon.  The film is also decent family
entertainment and contains little to no objectionable material.  As I
mentioned earlier in the review, if ten dollars seems like too much for
you to spend on this film, fear not because after its run in IMAX
theaters it is going to be brought out in regular theaters.  I must
stress that the best way to see this film is on an IMAX screen though.
Then you too can believe that whales/triangle things/sprites can fly.
[G]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - www.jaxfilmjournal.com

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
Cast: Tom Cruise, Thandie Newton, Ving Rhames, Dougray Scott, William R.
Mapother, Anthony Hopkins, Rade Serbedzija 
Written by: Robert Towne 
Directed by: John Woo 
Running Time: 123 minutes 
Screening Theater: Starnet Pablo 9 Theaters - Jacksonville Beach, FL 
"Well this is not Mission: Difficult, Mr. Hunt, it's Mission:
Impossible.  Difficult should be a walk in the park for you." 
  ---Agent Swanbeck (Sir Anthony Hopkins), the series' new Agent Phelps,
takes Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise) down a notch. 
A Russian scientist (Rade Serbedzija) has created a new virus (and its
antidote) called Chimera that destroys its host within twenty hours of
injection.  A rogue IMF agent, Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott), wants to
use the disease and cure to blackmail a pharmaceutical company into
selling him enough stock to make him owner of the company (he knows it
will soon be worth its weight in gold thanks to the outbreak of the
virus he is going to cause).  Posing as Ethan Hunt, Ambrose gains the
confidence of the scientist long enough to get only the cure, not
realizing that the scientist had injected himself with the virus to
prevent exactly what Ambrose was trying to do.  
The real Ethan Hunt is called in from his vacation to persuade beautiful
thief Nyah Nordoff-Hall (Thandie Newton) to assist the IMF team in
retrieving the stolen goods.  Ethan and Nyah fall quickly in love, but
Ethan soon finds himself in a real dilemma when he learns that his new
love has only been hired because she was a former lover of Ambrose's. 
Reluctantly, he sets up Nyah to be rescued from prison by Ambrose so she
can infiltrate his compound and send back intelligence to the team. 
Ethan must race against time to keep Ambrose from obtaining and
spreading the virus and prevent any harm from coming to Nyah. 
Although the first Mission:Impossible film was a moderate box office
success, audiences panned it because they felt the plot was too
confusing and there wasn't much action (although being a fan of the
series both old and new, I thought the movie was pretty decent and
especially gutsy to make Phelps a bad guy).  That problem has been
rectified in the sequel by making the plot more accessible (courtesy of
one of the writers of the previous entry, Robert Towne) and by turning
the film into one gigantic action set piece under the steady hand of
action film guru John Woo.  The end result is one of the most
entertaining (yet simple) action films made in a long while. 
Unfortunately, the first forty minutes or so are relatively slow,
dwelling mainly on Ethan and Nyah's quickly blossoming romance and
seeming more in place in a James Bond film than with the less glamorous
Mission:Impossible TV series.  Ethan's conflict is a compelling one, but
it seems very rushed (and comes about because of a near fatal car wreck
that Ethan himself causes!).  John Woo handles all of this with an
artistic flair that seems out of place, featuring a great deal of slow
fades and dramatically framed close-ups.  The surreal nature of these
sequences are distracting and ultimately a detriment to the film. 
Thankfully though, at the point Ambrose discovers Nyah's deception,
Mission:Impossible II becomes very entertaining and action-packed. 
Robert Towne's screenplay takes some of the conventions set up in the
first film and parodies them during a sequence where Ethan must break
into a high-rise building and retrieve the remaining specimens of the
virus.  After that, the action scenes just begin to build in intensity,
as is the case with many of Woo's previous high-octane films.  The final
half hour is an all out assault of action (a good deal of which is
ruined by the trailer, unfortunately).  
As far as summer entertainment goes, Mission:Impossible II is
serviceable fare.  Anyone looking for hardcore action won't be
disappointed (except for during the first half of the film, perhaps). 
Even if you weren't a fan of the first film, this entry deserves some
checking out.  [PG-13]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Rocky Horror Picture Show, The (1975)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Tim Curry, Susan Sarandon, Barry Bostwick, Richard O'Brien,
Patricia Quinn, Nell Campbell, Meat Loaf, Charles Gray, Jonathan Adams,
Peter Hinwood 
Written by: Jim Sharman and Richard O'Brien 
Directed by: Jim Sharman 
Running Time: 100 minutes 
"Say, any of you know how to Madison?" 
--- Brad "Asshole" Majors (Barry Bostwick) shows just how unhip he is
after watching the kooky Transylvanians wrap up their ode to the Time
Warp in the cult classic The Rocky Horror Picture Show. 
The story behind The Rocky Horror Picture Show is one of legend.  In the
early 70's, stage actor turned first-time playwright Richard O'Brien
decided he wanted to make a musical homage to the crazy B-movies he had
grown up with as a child, set to a bunch of catchy rock tunes of his own
design.  The result was the stage play The Rocky Horror Show, which
opened to fairly decent reviews in London in 1973 and was even hailed
the Best Musical of 1973 by prominent drama critics in England.  The
play was so successful that the film rights were immediately snapped up
and production on the film began a mere year later, in October of 1974. 
The film version (now titled The Rocky Horror PICTURE Show) was released
in 1975... and immediately tanked at the box office.  Whether it was
because Fox wasn't quite sure how to market it to audiences or that
audiences didn't quite know what to make of it themselves has never
really been determined, but the one common bit of knowledge about the
film was that it was a huge flop.  It seemed that the infectious spirit
brought about by the stage version had not been infused into the film
version and Fox quickly had it pulled from theaters. 
A year later, something entirely strange and magical happened.  Prints
of the film started to be distributed to theaters in small amounts and
were circulating at midnight shows across the country, and it was then
that a whole new audience found the film.  This new audience was prone
to dressing up like the characters from the film, acting out segments in
front of the screen as the movie played, yelling rude comments at the
screen, and just generally having a good time.  Word quickly spread
about this new phenomena of interactive film and The Rocky Horror
Picture Show's life as the ultimate cult film was born. 
For the virgins out there who are unaware, the plot centers around a
loving couple, Brad Majors (Barry Bostwick) and Janet Weiss (Susan
Sarandon), who come from a small town called Denton.  Brad and Janet
have just attended the wedding of two of their friends and decide that
they also want to be wed.  They plan a trip to see the man who led to
their meeting, Dr. Everett Scott (Jonathan Adams, who played the
narrator in the original stage version), but their car gets a flat on
the way to his home.  Remembering a castle they had seen back a few
miles down the road, they decide to walk there and see if the residents
have a phone they might be able to use to call for assistance. 
The castle is actually the home of a race of aliens from the planet
Transsexual (in the galaxy of Transylvania), who are lead by the
eccentric fishnet-stocking wearing mad scientist Dr. Frank-N-Furter (Tim
Curry).  Frank-N-Furter has masterminded the secret to creating life and
has done so in the form of Rocky (Peter Hinwood).  As Rocky becomes
accustomed to his new environment, Brad and Janet find themselves at the
mercy of Frank-N-Furter's mad schemes.  Little do any of them know that
the doctor's handyman, Riff-Raff (original author Richard O'Brien), and
domestic, Magenta (Patricia Quinn), are actually Transsexual planetary
protectors who have been sent to stop Frank from spreading his alien
evil all over the Earth. 
Going back and revisiting this film after ten years (1990 being the
first time I had ever seen it), it is amazing to me that this film ever
got made or has had the staying power that it has.  If I had been a Fox
executive around the time of its release, I don't think I would have
known what to make of it either.  For all intents and purposes it is a
bad movie (though bad in a really good sort of way), but sumptuous
production design and a great deal of incredibly catchy songs really
help to increase the likability of the film.  By the time the credits
role, it is fairly easy to have gotten wrapped up in the film and its
characters, and one really gets the feeling that Richard O'Brien
definitely was a fan of the old cheesy B-movies his film is based on. 
When I say that the wall-to-wall songs are catchy what I really mean to
say is that, once you hear them, they will be ingrained in your head for
all of eternity.  It goes without saying that the "Time Warp" is the
most popular song in the film.  Even people who have never seen the
movie know of that particular song.  What those who haven't seen the
movie don't know though, is that there are even more songs in the film
that are just as worthy of acknowledgment.  My personal favorite is
"Over at the Frankenstein Place", but "Dammit Janet" is also maddeningly
catchy.  Tim Curry's vocals on the rocking tune "Sweet Transvestite"
need to be heard to be believed.  The finale of the film, a big floor
show staged by Frank-N-Furter and featuring most of the cast in garters
and fishnets (including Barry Bostwick... frightening!), features no
less than four songs ("Rose Tint my World", "Don't Dream It", "Wild and
Untamed Thing", and "I'm Going Home"), all of which are immensely
singable. 
The film's true popularity and longevity resides in its audience
participation though.  Despite the catchiness of the songs, this movie
would have been long forgotten about if it hadn't have been for the
multitude of folks who dress up every Friday or Saturday night to rush
out and be a part of their own little floor show.  Watching this film at
home is nothing compared to actually experiencing this in a theater with
hundreds of rabid fans (unless you don't mind inviting friends over and
letting them shoot water guns in your home or letting them throw rice
and pieces of toast all over the place). 
Note: Director Jim Sharman brought back to the central characters of the
film, in the form of a sequel, resulting in the very much forgotten film
Shock Treatment, which picks up with Brad and Janet (this time played by
Cliff De Young and Jessica Harper!) as contestants on a game show in
their home town of Denton.  The two are menaced by the evil TV station
manager (also played by De Young), who wishes to claim Janet as his
own.  O'Brien returned as a writer/performer on the project (as did
Quinn, Campbell, and Gray in performance capacity only), but the film
had nowhere near the spirit of the original. 
25 years later, this film is still the pinnacle of cult filmdom and is
continuously screened at midnight all over the world.  As a lasting
testament to the longevity of the film and its legion of fans, a brand
new special edition 2-disc DVD set has been released that is the most
comprehensive compendium of Rocky Horror to date (even out shining the
laserdisc special edition that was released for its 20th anniversary). 
If you are one of those people who can't get enough of the film, this
disc should be more than enough to satisfy your appetites. 
In an attempt to recreate the interactivity of the film, Fox Home
Entertainment has released this wonderful 2-disc DVD set loaded with so
many extras that it'll take a good eight hours just to take in the
majority of it all.  The film itself is located on the first disc and
has been given a beautiful transfer that shows it in its original aspect
ratio of 1.85:1 (enhanced for 16x9 televisions).  The film is presented
in two different versions, the US theatrical version and the UK version
which adds a musical number during the finale called "Superheroes". 
For ambitious viewers, the disc also includes a hidden version (located
on the main menu by clicking left from the scene selection menu choice
and highlighting a pair of lips in the lower left corner) which presents
the film in the manner it was originally supposed to have been seen. 
Originally, the film was to have been similar to The Wizard of Oz, with
the first half of the it seen in black and white (and not changing to
color until the Transylvanians are first revealed to Brad and Janet
during the Time Warp musical number).  Most reports, including a
documentary on the disc, say that the color was supposed to appear when
Frank-N-Furter first shows up in the elevator, but it does seem to work
better where it was placed on this version, depicting the vast
difference between the world Brad and Janet were used to compared with
the one to which they are introduced. 
The film contains a commentary track by show creator (and faithful
handyman) Richard O'Brien and co-star Patricia Quinn which is fairly
enjoyable (and Quinn immediately starts off by refusing to speak about
Sarandon nearly contracting pneumonia while having to walk around wet
and half-naked on freezing cold sets, which she apparently complained
about the entire film and in future interviews).  The two seem like old
friends and have great stories to tell, but they also point out cast
members that are sadly no longer with us anymore (and there are quite a
few). 
Fox has also tried to recreate the feel of attending the film in a
theater with several audience participation segments.  The first feature
(and the most simple) is a subtitle prompter which lets you know when to
open up on people with your water guns or when the right time to throw
your toast is.  The second feature is an audience participation track,
which lets you in on what you might hear on a good night out at the
show.  Most of the comments are unintelligible because it is basically
just a large group of people screaming their heads off, but every once
and a while a comment can be heard that will invoke a bit of laughter. 
The final participation segment uses a technology very much like the
technology used on The Matrix DVD, where a pair of lips will appear
on-screen during certain scenes of the film (mostly during the musical
numbers) that can be selected by pressing enter on your remote.  When
selected, you will be taken out of the film and into a live
participation version of the scene put on during one of the many
screenings that occur all over the world.  Once the segment is over, you
are deposited right back into the film where you left off. 
The first disc also contains a few DVD-ROM goodies for those with that
particular type of DVD player.  There is a timeline of the evolution
from the stage play version to worldwide cult sensation, a video
jukebox, a You Don't Know Jack-styled trivia game (which is about as
bare bones a You Don't Know Jack parody as it can be), and a bizarre
Mad-Libs styled word game known as Riff-Raff's Story Lab.  Links to the
Rocky Horror websites are also available from the DVD-ROM portion of the
disc. 
The second disc features even more goodies for the person who loves
extras.  Former lite-rock video channel turned music historians VH-1
have allowed some of their outtake footage from the "Behind the Music:
Rocky Horror" special that they ran earlier in the year to be shown
here, as well as a Pop-Up Video for the Meat Loaf-sung "Hot Patootie". 
The "Behind the Music" segments are all very interesting, especially
Richard O'Brien's jaunt through the castle (which is now a hotel!) where
the film was originally shot.  There are also extensions of the
Sarandon, Bostwick, Quinn, O'Brien,
and Meat Loaf interviews. 
As far as extras for the film itself go, there are two deleted musical
numbers that are also included here.  One of which is just the
"Superheroes" number available in the UK version, but there is also
another rare musical number presented here called "Once in a While".  A
series of alternate takes are also presented here, but none of them are
really much of a revelation (except for the undressing scene in which we
see that Patricia Quinn is having a hard time unbuttoning Barry
Bostwick's pants).  For the completist who must have every little bit of
Rocky Horror paraphernalia, a misprinted end sequence and alternate
credit sequence are also presented here.  Rounding out the disc is a
decent documentary called Rocky Horror Double Feature Video Show, two
theatrical trailers (proclaiming that the film is "a different sort of
Jaws"), a still gallery, and two sing-a-longs (for "Toucha Toucha Touch
Me" and "Sweet Transvestite"). 
Fox's special edition is the DVD set that Rocky Horror fans have been
waiting for all their lives ("You're lucky... I'm lucky... he's lucky...
we're all lucky!").  It's not just amazing enough that tons of classic
Italian films are finally getting their recognition in the U.S., but
even long standing traditions are finally receiving their due on the
wonderful DVD format.  As with their excellent DVDs of The Abyss, Fight
Club, Independence Day, and The Sound of Music, Fox shows that they have
most certainly made the commitment to provide the things that DVD lovers
want.  I raise a toast to them (cue the throwing of the bread) as I cut
out the lights, sit back, and watch those disembodied lips begin to sing
about B-movie tradition. [R]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger - Widescreen25
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Editor in Chief  - The Jacksonville Film Journal
Specializing in DVDs, home video, cult favorites and the indie scene.
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Jennifer Lopez, Vince Vaughn, Vincent D'Onofrio, Marianne
Jean-Baptiste, Jake Weber, Dylan Baker, Patrick Bauchau, Gerry Becker,
James Gammon, Catherine Sutherland, Jake Thomas, Pruitt Taylor Vince 
Written by: Mark Protosevich 
Directed by: Tarsem Singh
Catherine Deane (Jennifer Lopez) is a psychologist who has been hired to
participate in a project where she can enter the minds of comatose
victims and try to interact with their subconscious in an attempt to
wake them up.  She has been experiencing moderate success with a young
boy in a coma, but the boy's parents aren't happy with the apparent lack
of progress and the toll of her job is having adverse affects on her
regular life.  As if trying to assure the boy's parents wasn't hard
enough on her, a new development arises that furthers the strain on
Deane's mental faculties. 
A vicious serial killer named Carl Stargher (Vincent D'Onofrio) has been
kidnapping women, locking them in an automated cell that drowns them
slowly in a matter of days, then soaking the corpses in bleach to turn
them into life-sized dolls.  Just after kidnapping his latest victim and
locking her in the cell, Stargher has a traumatic experience that
triggers a schizophrenic virus in his brain and causes him to sink in an
eternal catatonia.  The police, led by FBI agent Peter Novak (Vince
Vaughn) are able to locate Stargher by some clues he left while dumping
his previous victim's body, but they feel all hope is lost for his
current victim due to his vegetative state.  In a last ditch attempt,
they ask Deane and the scientists that created the project to undergo
the frightening task of entering Stargher's mind to try and find the
location of the victim locked in the deadly cell... a cell which will
completely fill with water in the next 40 hours!
Initial reports about this film described it as a cross between The
Silence of the Lambs and The Matrix.  While it does share some
characteristics with both films (particularly the first forty minutes,
which seem almost like a condensed version of Lambs), The Cell also
seems to contain elements of Dreamscape and Brainstorm.  The buzz around
this project is that first-time feature film director Tarsem Singh (who
won many awards for his video of R.E.M.'s "Losing My Religion") wanted a
script that he could fashion images out of instead of a cohesive story,
and a good portion of this film supports that theory.  
Despite the borrowed elements from the aforementioned films and a script
that contains several logically questionable moments, The Cell does
feature some remarkable imagery.  All of the sequences where we delve
into someone's mind are incredibly beautiful (including the dank mind of
Stargher, whose thoughts are reminiscent of an H.R. Giger painting come
to life mixed with a Tool music video), proving that Singh is as adept
at filming strange and wonderful images as his acclaim would lead us to
believe.  The first sequence that takes place in Stargher's mind is by
far the best, featuring one of the most ingenious traps I've ever seen
in a film (involving a horse, which no one seeing this film will
probably forget), a zoo-like display of Stargher's victims which are
animated like marionettes, and Stargher himself in a giant purple cape
that spans the walls of his mental throne room.  If the film had
continued within this dirty monstrous world I would have deemed the film
brilliant, but alas, the sequences only become more silly as they go
along (despite a painful nipple ring removal later in the film). 
The cast is basically just an excuse for there to be some moderate plot
semblance during the parade of images, but at least Vincent D'Onofrio
turns in his usual bizarre and psychotic performance (magnified by ten,
thanks to the environment in which the film has been placed).  In my
opinion, D'Onofrio was one of the best creepy actors I have ever seen in
a film, but his film choices as of late have been so completely awful
(i.e.- The Newton Boys, Feeling Minnesota, The Thirteenth Floor, and The
Velocity of Gary) that I have begun to rethink my initial assessment of
him.  The character of Stargher is an excellent role for him though, and
will probably lead to a bit of typecasting for him.  
Detractors of violence and disturbing images will want to stay far away
from this film, as it contains heavy doses of both.  Besides the nipple
ring removal I mention above, there is also Stargher's penchant for
hanging suspended off of the floor by the rings that pierce his back and
legs (prior to his catatonia and capture) which will have audiences
recoiling.  A sequence where Catherine enters Stargher's mind and finds
him recreating the disemboweling of his first victim is also pretty
disquieting.  One moment also features a character having his intestines
slowly removed from his body by an old fashioned hand cranked spit-like
device. 
As a narrative film, The Cell is sorely lacking.  As a collection of
images though, The Cell is extremely well done.  Although the latter
sequences in the film contain fewer disturbing imagery than the first
half, Singh has done what he supposedly set out to do: make a film
solely for the purpose of stringing some remarkable images together. 
Unfortunately, a well-written script should have been considered too,
because without it The Cell just seems like any other music video we
could see on MTV (provided, of course, that MTV allowed for the use of
graphic violence and language in music videos). 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Editor - The Jacksonville Film Journal
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Ice From the Sun (2001)
Cast: DJ Vivona, Ramona Midgett, Angela Zimmerly, Todd Tevlin, Jason
Christ, Tommy Biondo, Jo Palermo, Tracey Hein, Jessica Wyman, Charles
Huevelman, Dwight Carl Spurgin II, Mark W. Kettler, Jennifer
Poirrier-Wallace 
Written and Directed by: Eric Stanze 
Running Time: 116 minutes 
"You can't have any of this. It's all mine!" 
--- A twisted priest (Charles Huevelman) hordes his tasty fried chicken
while Dana (Angela Zimmerly) looks on uninterested. 
An evil presence, appropriately named The Presence (DJ Vivona), rules
over an alternate dimension where neither angels nor demons can touch
him.  For kicks, The Presence likes to trick a human into rounding up
five of his or her friends so they can all be sent to his dimension and
be systematically slaughtered.  When something goes wrong and one of The
Presence's recent victims escapes, the angels and demons are alerted to
his existence and feel he is a threat that needs to be stopped.  They
enlist the help of Alison (Ramona Midgett), a recent suicide victim, to
return to the flesh and follow the six new enlistees through the ice
wall that surrounds the the nether-realm.  
Her mission is to melt away the ice barrier and allow the angels and
demons access by reminding The Presence of who he once was, an ancient
court jester named Abraham who lost his job when his king and queen were
killed.  The king's sorcerer, Amblyn (who also lost his job), decided to
take Abraham under his wing as an apprentice.  During the downtime in
his unemployment, Amblyn decided to create a new dimension where
sorcery, evil, and torture ruled.  
Abraham wished to follow his master into this new realm, so he was asked
to show his devotion to the evil wizard by murdering his one true love. 
In this new realm, Amblyn would allow Abraham to pursue the sport of
hunting and destroying the humans that would be brought to this realm. 
After each murder, Abraham would become stronger, until his power
surpassed that of Amblyn's.  Because of the screw-up that allowed the
recent escape, Abraham was able to destroy his master and take control
of the realm himself.  As Alison quests to find Abraham and show him the
errors of his ways, the six new hapless humans are allowed to live out
their worst nightmares and then be brutally murdered.  
If there's one thing I can't stand when I see a film, it's when the film
is pretentious and arty just for the sake of being pretentious and
arty.  Films like Eraserhead and Begotten are two of the worst examples
of this, and now Ice from the Sun can be added to this list.  This film
is essentially an 80 minute stalk-and-slash film (following the Dante's
Inferno idea that your hell corresponds to how you lived your life or
any one of the plots to Nightmare on Elm Street 3 through 6) intercut
with almost 40 minutes of strange and (supposedly) haunting images, many
of which serve more to confuse than to further the plot.  If there
aren't bizarre images floating past the screen, then we get pointless
shots of a suicidal Alison staring at her breakfast for minutes at a
time or contemplating whether or not she should answer her phone. 
Compelling, but ultimately not. 
The opening credits sequence is designed like a music video for some
unknown industrial band featuring various random images from the film
interspersed with other random images.  The credits run the entire
length of the song which is almost five minutes and the actual cast
listing and other credit information doesn't pop up until near the end
of the sequence.  When the opening credits began I thought my VCR had
accidentally cut off and a interstitial from MTV2 had found its way to
my TV.  At least the music in the film is pretty decent, made up of
mostly industrial and hard rock music and even features a song by Ramona
Midgett. 
At the beginning of the film it is established that The Presence
possesses supernatural powers like shooting bullets out of the palms of
his hands and decapitating people by waving his hand in front of them
(and he talks like a Darth Vader clone without the heavy breathing). 
For some reason though, he delegates all of his main stalkings to what
seems like the supporting cast of Deliverance.  One over-alled cretin
handles The Presence's gravedigging and likes to chop peoples heads off
with his shovel, then there's an inbred father (Dwight Spurgin) and his
two inbred children (Mark Kettler and Jennifer Poirrier-Wallace) that
take care of a young woman who has been transformed into a half dog-half
human mix with a shotgun, and of course a big truck driving guy that
likes to tie people up naked to the back of his vehicle and drag them
across stone roads before pouring salt all over their wounds.  Why would
you want to give responsibilities to a bunch of "rednecks" when you
yourself had all of these cool powers? 
And how is it that the fellow that screws over all of his buddies is
able to round up exactly five friends to complete the number of people
required to enter the realm at exactly the same time?  I can barely get
more than two together all at once at any given moment. 
The most ridiculous segment though comes right before the aforementioned
dragging/salting sequence.  The character in question, Dana (Angela
Zimmely), has her turn up to be killed and is standing at the front of a
movie theater in which The Presence is seated.  A priest holding two
naked dirty humans on leashes walks in and sits down next to a large
platter of fried chicken.  He picks up the entire platter and starts to
enjoy the chicken, taunting Dana as she looks on with no interest
whatsoever.  When she starts to leave, the priest chides her for going
before the performance starts and then something that looks like a
either a creature from a GWAR show or a Terry Gilliam animation from
Monty Python come to life, walks out, and makes like it wants to be
crucified by her.  The Presence starts to clap annoyingly (which
continues for the rest of the sequence) until Dana takes off with the
strange creature following her.  When it finally catches up to her, she
stabs it in its giant eyeball and is covered in slimy glop that spurts
from the ruptured organ. 
The box for the film claims "Because of the horrifying nature of the
motion picture, parental discretion is advised for persons under the age
of 18.  Contains nudity and graphic violence".  While both is certainly
true, there doesn't seem to be much of either in any large amounts. 
Besides a loving close up of a spurting neck stump, a semi-graphic
self-surgery scene, and two instances of head trauma (one run over and
one melting), most of the gore is just of the spraying blood or bloody
wound covered body variety.  As for nudity, it is very sparse, but at
least we get to see Angela Zimmerly (far and away the most attractive
cast member) before her body is bruised, torn, and bloodied by the
dragging incident.  
Ice from the Sun has been released on VHS by www.b-movie.com.  It has
been presented in in full-frame only and the transfer (for a film shot a
good deal in 8mm) is pretty decent.  Besides the decent soundtrack
(which is also available from www.b-movie.com), a making-of video is
also available called On Thin Ice.  I haven't had the opportunity to see
the documentary, but I actually would have been interested to see what
the set was like while all of the shots were being filmed, if only to
see how director Eric Stanze (director of a similar cult film called
Savage Harvest), conducted the atmosphere on set. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Drainiac! (2000) (V)
Cast: Georgia Hatzis, Alexandra Boylan, Ethan Krasnoo, Samara Doucette,
Philip (Phip) Barbour, Robert Gorden, Steven Bornstein, Elizabeth Hurley 
Written and Directed by: Brett Piper 
Running Time: 81 minutes 
"What's going on?" 
"A freaking exorcism! Now shut up!" 
--- A high school student (Ethan Krasnoo) questions some strange goings
on and exorcist Leon Plummer (Phip Barbour) answers directly. 
A young girl Julie (Georgia Hatzis) is forced to spend the weekend
assisting her aloof father fix up a ratty house he intends to sell off. 
Julie has been having nightmares ever since her mother committed suicide
and her father isn't helping matters any.  Unbeknownst to Julie and her
father, an evil water spirit resides in the pipes of the house and it's
out for blood.  When Julie's friends Lisa, Jake, and Tanya (Alexandra
Boylan, Ethan Krasnoo, and Samara Doucette respectively) come to visit,
the evil force decides to make itself known and the four teens must do
everything they can to stop it. 
Drainiac! is a moderately entertaining low budget horror film from Brett
Piper, the director of the Troma classic A Nymphoid Barbarian in
Dinosaur Hell (originally titled Dark Fortress and available on DVD with
a great commentary track from Piper himself), and it feels like an Evil
Dead film in spirit.  In fact, many of the same type of special effects
seen in Evil Dead II are similar to the ones seen in this film.  I've
always been against rampant computer generated effects and I find it
refreshing to see good old fashioned stop motion animation and puppetry,
and Drainiac! certainly doesn't disappoint in this regard. 
The gore effects are done fairly well for a low budget film and some of
them even caught me by surprise.  There are several instances of flesh
melting off of heads, one painful castration, an exploding body, and
even an naked evil spirit that rips its head apart to reveal its
frightening skull.  One particularly well made sequence involves Julie
taking a bath when blood starts to pour into the water, completely
enveloping her while she relaxes.  Eventually what looks like uncooked
chicken and umbilical cords start to wrap around her body and pull her
into the drain.  A very creepy and interesting scene. 
There are even some decent moments of humor, mainly brought about by the
character of Wade (Robert Gorden), who gets off a few smart ass remarks
at some of the other characters before he becomes creepy and tries to
attack Tanya.  As for the rest of the cast, they perform well and at
least two of them are very pleasing to the eye.  Georgia Hatzis is
pretty attractive and she even does a nude scene before she is covered
by the uncooked chicken creature.  The most attractive cast member
though is Alexandra Boylan who plays Lisa.  She has the distinct look of
a future Sherilyn Fenn and I hope she continues to work in film.  For
fans of Elizabeth Hurley, guess what... she's not in this film, but an
actress with the same name as her appears as Julie's deceased mother. 
Although there are some lapses in logic (such as the character of Leon
the exorcist, showing up at the haunted house for seemingly no reason),
Drainiac! is still a decently entertaining way to kill an hour and
twenty minutes.  Spectrum Films is handling the foreign distribution of
the film, but unfortunately there is currently no US distributor.  If
there happens to be a US distributor out there that is looking for a
solidly acted, well made horror film that could be a decent repeat
renter at the video store I suggest they look towards Drainiac!.  I know
I'd give this film a try if I saw it on the shelf of my local video
store. 
For more information about the film, visit Kinetic Image, the web site
of the creators of Drainiac! at www.kineticimage.com 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Bats (1999/I)

"...because I'm a scientist.  That's what we do!"
    --- Dr. Alexander McCabe (Bob Gunton), in response to why he created
evil bats.
Alright folks, stop me if you've heard this one: genetically altered
animals wreak havoc on a town and a small band of locals, assisted by
a specialist in the particular animal's field, must team up to stop
the mutant creatures before they can multiply and spread across the
earth.  Oh yeah, the military is on their way to bomb the town as
well, so they are running short on time.  Sound familiar?  Such is the
plot of the Destination Films release of Bats.
Dina Meyer stars as the "bat specialist" Sheila, who is pulled from
her research (along with her annoying sidekick, played with irritating
deftness by Leon) in order to help a small Texas town figure out why
some local citizens and animals have been chewed to death recently.
With the help of the local sheriff (Lou Diamond Phillips), a CDC
official (Carlos Jacott), and a scientist (Bob Gunton), Sheila
discovers it is indeed bats (who have been genetically altered by
Gunton's character to be more aggressive and omnivorous, in order to
be used as a military weapon!).
I have to say here that I knew exactly what I was getting into going
into this film.  There's not a frame of promotional footage I have
seen for the film that would have led me to believe it was going to be
any good.  In this respect, the film never disappointed me.  This film
reaches a level that transcends the "so bad it's good" level and
borders on the downright insane.  The effects are awful, the script is
contrived, and for most of the feature I was laughing at things that
were supposed to be taken seriously (I think).  I challenge anyone to
sit through the scene, where a bat stalks a baby in a crib while
another bat terrorizes a patron eating at a diner, with a straight
face.
Thankfully, the performances are as good as they can be considering
the material the actors had to perform with.  Dina Meyer has always
been the highlight of any of the films she has been in (Johnny
Mnemonic, Dragonheart, and Starship Troopers... the latter being the
only film out of that batch with any actual merit), and this one is no
exception.  While one never really gets the impression that Meyer's
character could be a bat expert in reality, one never really cares to
doubt it either.  She gives as good a performance as could be
expected, plus she's nice to look at for an hour and a half.  Lou
Diamond Phillips is also serviceable here, as the small town sheriff
turned eventual hero.  Although when we first meet his character he
knows bats are the reason for what's going on in town, for some reason
later on he suddenly becomes amazed to learn that the actual cause of
the deaths in town are because of bats.  The only bad performance in
the film is that of Leon's.  He is relegated to the "I'm not sticking
around here!" character and proceeds to repeat variations of that line
for the majority of the film even though he stays.
Anyone who can't immediately tell that Bob Gunton (the bad guy in
Patch Adams and countless other films) is going to eventually turn on
the gang and side with his creations before his eminent death will
probably be surprised, but I highly doubt it.  Even if he hadn't been
the villain in just about every film he's ever been in, so many
obvious hints are given to indicate the devious act that it holds no
shock whatsoever.  In fact, his death is welcome, because it finally
starts moving the plot towards the finale.
If the plot doesn't sound ridiculous to you yet, then check out these
little tidbits: A multitude of bats inexplicably disperses when a
police officer cocks his pistol.  An entire town disregards the
sheriff and doctor's orders to stay indoors after a curfew is
instigated, causing mass hysteria when the bats come out in full
force, killing several townsfolk.  A government official blows off
Shelia's instructions (to wait until dawn to install a cooling unit in
the bats' cave that will kill all of them off) by pulling a night job,
resulting in the death of an entire military unit.  A cavern full of
bat feces never ignites when a phosphorus flare is lit right in the
middle of it.  Finally, to top it all off, this little Texas town is
showing Nosferatu in it's single screen theater (for reference, our
town has over a million people in it with nearly 150 movie screens,
and we're lucky to even get Kevin Smith's Dogma).
The most laughable part of the movie though comes from the
ill-conceived bat puppets.  While the actual bat attack scenes are
shot with rapid fire editing (making the scenes nearly impossible to
comprehend what's going on), the scenes where a bat is called upon to
interact with a live actor are usually shot more low-key.  Therefore
we the audience get loving close-ups of the most unrealistic, rubbery
bat puppets ever committed to film.  Being able to see the puppeteer's
arms would be the only things that could have made these creations
worse.
After all of this, if you still decide Bats might be the movie for
you, don't say you haven't been warned.  Trust me when I say that it's
a lot more fun to trash than it is to sit through.  I just wish that
Dina Meyer would be cast in more roles or at least choose better films
to appear in.  She's definitely a talent that is going to waste in
films like these.
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com

Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Written and Directed by: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Running Time: 87 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 31, 1999
The trailers and the beginning of the move sum up this plot very
easily.  Three filmmakers venture into the woods of Maryland to track
down the legend of the Blair Witch for a documentary they are making.
They disappear and their footage is discovered a year later buried
underneath the foundation of a one hundred year old house.  From
there, things become a little more complicated.
I can say, with absolute assurance, that no film has ever had quite
the impact that this little movie has had on me.  Although I know it
was all a staged "mockumentary", there's no denying the psychological
impact this film will leave on you.  I didn't feel much upon initially
watching it.  I just thought it was an interesting film with some
pretty creepy parts.  I never even dreamed that thirty minutes after
the film had ended I would be frightened out of my mind just
discussing it with a friend.  I've gotten chills every time I've
brought it up since then.  This is not a movie that hits you right
away.  Instead this is a movie that sits at the base of your spine,
waits until you think everything is okay, then it slowly starts to
creep it's way up into your mind.  This is truly the most frightening
movie I have ever had the pleasure to watch.
The film is comprised of home video and 16mm camera footage that the
documentarians supposedly shot for their Blair Witch film, so don't
expect any steadi-cam shots or fancy camera work.  This is as real as
it gets folks.  I don't recommend sitting too close to the theater
screen though, because I guarantee you will get motion sickness from
the constant movement of the camera.  The performances of the three
lead actors in the film are so real, you may find yourself questioning
whether all of this has really happened or not.
This is definitely a movie that warrants home video viewing,
especially due to the fact that the bulk of the movie was shot with a
standard home video camera.  The reality of the images will strike
frighteningly close to home when viewed as actual video instead of the
tape-to-film transfer done for the big screen.  Word has it that a
special edition DVD with boatloads of extras (hours of deleted scenes,
alternate endings, commentary, the Sci-Fi Channel special, and others)
is being planned for release.  I urge Artisan Entertainment to forge
ahead with this plan and give us what could be the DVD to rival all
DVD's.  I know I'll be first in line to buy one.  [R]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Brazil (1985)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Jonathan Pryce, Kim Griest, Bob Hoskins, Robert DeNiro, Ian Holm,
Katherine Helmond, Michael Palin 
Written by: Terry Gilliam, Tom Stoppard and Charles McKeown 
Directed by: Terry Gilliam 
Running Time: 142 minutes 
One of the most talked about films of the 80's, Brazil is one of the
most stunning (but also the most bleak) films ever to be produced.  Part
of the trilogy of science fiction genre films (including Legend and
Dune) which were torn apart, re-edited, and rescored by then Universal
head honcho Sid Sheinberg, Terry Gilliam's piece de resistance has
garnered the largest amount of press.  This is due mostly to Gilliam's
determination to have the film restored to its original version and his
willingness to discuss the situation to anyone who will listen.  Gilliam
also had a full page ad taken out in Variety magazine after the film was
released asking Sheinberg when he was going to release his complete
edit.  It has taken almost twelve years, but Gilliam's final cut has
finally been released on both laserdisc and DVD.
In an eerily ironic twist, the film's incredible narrative parallels
Gilliam's battle for the proper treatment of the material.  Jonathan
Pryce is featured as an everyman that dreams of a life outside the
Metropolis-like bureaucratic hell (known as the Ministry of Information)
he is trapped in.  His life seems to turn around when he gets a
promotion within his company and literally meets the girl of his
dreams.  Everything appears to be working out until he suspects that the
girl he is in love with is a terrorist.  When he pursues her, he is
singled out as a terrorist as well and must fight the same system he
once worked for in order to restore his life.  His dreams quickly turn
to nightmares as his world comes crumbling down around him.  Despite its
futuristic setting, Brazil echoes many of the problems felt by any
modern day person who feels trapped in their current job. 
The film has been released in three different versions since it
originally appeared in 1985: the 131 minute theatrical version, the
"Love Conquers All" 94 minute TV version, and the 142 minute director's
cut.  Of the three, Gilliam's 142 minute cut is obviously the most
magnificent. I had only seen the film in its truncated 94 minute
television version prior to this recent release and had originally found
the movie hard to understand and uninvolved (a problem which is more
than solved with the director's cut).  In fact, I don't think I had ever
made it through an entire viewing of the cut film before finally seeing
Gilliam's original vision.  If I had never read any information
concerning Gilliam's wishes for the film, I may have never bothered
watching the complete version years later when it became available on
laserdisc.  I'm glad I did though, because Gilliam has constructed one
of the most incredible films I have ever seen. 
Brazil is especially remarkable on a visual level, thanks to Norman
Garwood's impressive designs.  Not only do the cities feel oppressive on
an Orwellian degree, but also every indoor set is claustrophobic enough
to lend the feeling of being trapped in a job where death is literally
the only escape from the rut.  The dream sequences are very imaginative
and grow steadily darker in tone as the film progresses until they
become the stuff of nightmares.  No film Gilliam has made before or
since has had the incredible visuals that this one contains.  Brazil is
definitely his most personal work and an obvious labor of love. 
The full director's cut special edition of Brazil was initially made
available on laserdisc and has recently made its way to DVD, both
courtesy of The Criterion Collection.  Split onto five discs for laser
and three for DVD, the Brazil special edition is one of the most
detailed box sets ever released.  The film is presented in its original
1.82:1 aspect ratio with a commentary track recorded by Gilliam, two
documentaries detailing the making of the film and fights that Gilliam
went through in order to get his film released properly, storyboards for
all of the dream sequences, production and promotional stills, and
trailers.  
The most impressive inclusion on the two sets is the "Love Conquers All"
94-minute version.  After watching the director's cut, seeing the
chopped-up version (that was originally intended for theatrical
release!) is a disturbing experience.  Gilliam's entire message is
nearly lost or severely altered thanks to the wishes of Sid Sheinberg to
have a film that ran under two hours and included a happy ending.  A
commentary track by film historian David Morgan is also included, which
details all of the changes and inclusions the editors made and how they
affect the original narrative.  For those who don't mind spending a
little more cash than they are normally used to, the Brazil special
edition is well worth the extra money. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Editor - The Jacksonville Film Journal
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
Cast: Matt Damon, Drew Barrymore, Bill Pullman, Nathan Lane, Tone-Loc,
Jim Breuer, Jim Cummings, Janeane Garofalo, David L. Lander, John
Leguizamo, Ron Perlman, Charles Rocket, Alex D. Linz 
Written by: Ben Edlund, John August, and Joss Whedon 
Directed by: Don Bluth, Gary Goldman, and Art Vitello 
Running Time: 97 minutes 
In the year 3028, an evil race of aliens made up entirely of energy
known as the Drej fear that humanity has become too technologically
advanced, upon learning that the humans have recently finished
construction on a device known only as the Titan Project.  Young Cale
(Alex D. Linz), a boy whose father designed the Titan, is whisked away
by a few of his father's friends as the Drej begin a harrowing attack on
the planet.  All of humanity boards various spacecraft in the hopes of
getting away from the chaos before the Drej wipe them out.  Before he
departs alone on the Titan, Cale's father gives him a ring and tells him
that the future of humanity will depend on him.  They go their separate
ways and Cale is able to see his father escape just as the Drej
completely obliterate Earth.  
Fifteen years later, Cale (Matt Damon) is working in the salvage
business, cutting up large derelict spacecraft that clutter space. 
During a break he runs into Korso (Bill Pullman), an old friend of his
father's who has been sent to find Cale, because the ring his father
gave him contains a map that reacts with a device in his hand that will
track down the whereabouts' of Cale's father and the Titan.  Cale is
reluctant to go until the Drej show up and try to kill him, forcing him
to join Korso's ragtag team consisting of Preed (Nathan Lane), Gune
(John Leguizamo), Stith (Janeane Garofalo), and much to Cale's pleasure,
the lovely Akima (Drew Barrymore).  With Korso and his team's help (and
the assistance of some bizarre alien races they meet along the way),
Cale must beat the Drej to the final resting place of the Titan so the
human race may once again thrive.  
Titan A.E. springs from an amazing pedigree.  All of the writers and
directors on the film have come from an excellent background of
animated, sci-fi, and action genre projects, so why doesn't it seem like
the film worked as well as it should?  It's hard to blame the writers
considering where they come from: Ben Edlund is the creator of the
wonderful Tick comic and animated series; John August is the
screenwriter of the incredibly fun mini-Pulp Fiction homage Go! and the
big screen update of Charlie's Angels; and Joss Whedon is the
uber-writer behind Buffy the Vampire Slayer (both the film and the TV
series), Toy Story, Alien:Resurrection, and the X-Men movie (plus he
also did uncredited work on Speed, Waterworld, and Twister).  The same
applies for the directors: Don Bluth and Gary Goldman have worked
together on many decent animated films such as The Secret of NIMH, An
American Tail, All Dogs go to Heaven, and Anastasia (and a few not so
good like Thumbelina, The Pebble and the Penguin, and the absurd
Rock-a-Doodle) and Bluth alone created two of the most important video
games in my life as a child, Dragon's Lair and Space Ace; while Art
Vitello has been the story editor on "The Tick", key animator for ILM on
Poltergeist, director of the animated series' "The Tick", "Tiny Toon
Adventures", "The Real Ghostbusters", and "Disney's Gummi Bears", plus
he also produced the "G.I. Joe" animated series that I used to rush home
to watch everyday after school.  
NOTE: Could part of my problem with the film be attributed to the two
men who get the "Story By" credit?  Randall (Speed 2: Cruise Control)
McCormick and Hans (Anaconda) Bauer are the men behind the original
story and I'm glad that it was handed off to the other writers,
especially after seeing the mess that Speed 2 was.  Both men have only
written three films apiece and Titan A.E. is one (while the other
unmentioned films by both men are virtually unheard of).  
The visuals in the film are amazing and it even plays like it could be
the tamer younger brother to the Heavy Metal series, but ultimately it
feels a little empty.  I never really felt like I was given much of a
chance to sympathize with the characters (although the characters in
Titan A.E. are far more three-dimensional, both emotionally and
physically, than the ones in Lucas' droll "epic" The Phantom Menace). 
The film basically moves from set piece to set piece without much
thought to fleshing out the characters' relationships better.  As a
result, too many things seem rushed into and forced (particularly Cale
and Akima's relationship, which only gets a chance to truly strengthen
towards the end of the film).  Like Disney's recent Dinosaur, Titan A.E.
seems more concerned with showing flashy animation than presenting a
decent story (although Titan A.E. is the better of the two films by a
large margin). 
A big complaint I have about the film is Cale's father giving him the
ring.  By all accounts, there is no need for him to pass the ring along
considering that he now has nothing to do while hiding out in the Titan
except to wait for fifteen years for someone to track down Cale (who
could have been dead for all he knew) and bring him and the ring.  I
could understand if two rings had been made, one with the map and one to
activate the ship's ultimate function, but that is sadly not the case. 
Instead, the father gives away the key to unlock the secrets of the ship
to his son as an excuse for some Star Wars-like "immature young boy must
grow up and save a universe" type story.  If any element of the story
seemed forced it was certainly this one. 
I was impressed by the dark subject matter that was presented in this
film.  Considering its PG rating and animated style, it naturally leans
more towards being a children's film than an adult action film, but
there are some very strong elements in it.  Characters bleed profusely
when shot, necks are broken, and, in the ultimate example, the planet we
call home is completely destroyed within ten minutes of the Fox studio
logo's appearance on screen.  If a better story had been thrown into the
mix, I would have proclaimed this one of the best films of the year. 
Thankfully, the film does keep the annoying sidekicks down to a minimum
(are you listening, Mr. Lucas?) and there are no annoying breaks where
the cast progresses the story in song.  Luckily Bluth and gang, in
another parallel to Heavy Metal, decided to go with modern rock as their
soundtrack.  Unfortunately, the Creed song "Higher" featured in the
trailer is nowhere to be found in this film, but there are some other
fine songs by Lit, Powerman 5000, and others.  A soundtrack is available
for the film and some CD stores are even giving away a free Titan A.E.
comic with the purchase of it. 
Overall, Titan A.E. should have had a little more work put into it. 
Although individual sequences stand out (particularly the scene
featuring the chase through the ring of ice chunks), the bulk of the
movie collapses under its own weight.  At just a little over 90 minutes
though, the film is never dull nor does it wear out its welcome.  I was
just hoping for something with a little more substance.  
If you're just looking for something to kill time, Titan A.E. is a
decent bet whether you're young or old.  If you're looking for a thought
provoking study on how the human race will evolve and move on from where
we currently are, then you may want to look elsewhere.  This film is
pure summer fluff with some decent talent behind it... and who can argue
with that?  [PG]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Skinned Alive (1989)
Cast: Mary Jackson, Scott Spiegel, Susan Rothacker, Floyd Ewing Jr.,
Lester Clark, Barbara Katz-Norrod, Jon Killough, J.R. Bookwalter 
Written and Directed by: Jon Killough 
Running Time: 78 minutes 
Crawldaddy (Mary Jackson) and her children Phink (Scott Spiegel) and
Violet (Susan Rothacker) travel the highways and byways in their mobile
tannery, skinning people who get in their way for use in the products
they make.  When their van breaks down, they are invited to spend the
night with the friendly mechanic Tom (Lester Clark) and his annoying
wife Whinnie (Barbara Katz-Norrod).  Tom and Whinnie have no idea that
their guests are cold-blooded murderers, but Tom's neighbor Paul (Floyd
Ewing Jr.), an ex-policeman kicked off the force for mistakenly shooting
a Hispanic woman in a junkyard (which led to him becoming an alcoholic
and also forced his bitchy wife to divorce him), starts to suspect that
things aren't right with Crawldaddy's clan. 
Skinned Alive is an ambitious but ultimately insufficient film (that
owes more than a simple debt to The Texas Chain Saw Massacre).  There is
a pervasive feeling throughout the film that it should be more epic than
it actually turns out to be.  Most of the action is localized to the
homes of Tom and Paul and rarely ventures beyond that (save for a few
scenes that take place on rural roads and in Tom's auto shop) and very
few other people are shown except for the main characters and eventual
victims of Crawldaddy's evil.  I understand that this was a completely
low budget film and locations and extras would be hard to come by, but I
just couldn't help but feel there should have been more to the story. 
The ending is a real surprise though and was an incredibly gutsy move on
the part of Mr. Killough. 
The gore effects in the film are all well done though, and do lend a bit
of authenticity to the film.  Characters are impaled, shot, run over,
and of course, skinned (although I don't recall ever seeing anyone
actually skinned alive as the title suggests, even though it's really
not made clear whether or not the Jehovah's Witness character played by
producer J.R. Bookwalter is actually dead during his skinning scene). 
Except for a few shots of a "body" being cut into that look more like
someone cutting into a birthday cake, the majority of the remaining
special effects are decently done. 
The cast is largely made up of stock actors and crew that should be
familiar to anyone who has seen the films of J.R. Bookwalter, and the
director Jon Killough even makes an appearance as a hitchhiker who
becomes the film's first victim of Crawldaddy and her children.  The
most "famous" cast member though, is Scott Spiegel.  Spiegel is best
known for his co-writing credit on the cult favorite Evil Dead II and
more recently as the co-writer/director of From Dusk till Dawn 2 (and he
is also responsible for writing the universally panned Clint
Eastwood/Charlie Sheen effort The Rookie!).  Here Spiegel shows what he
can do as an actor (a trade which he is not unfamiliar to) and turns in
an eccentric performance as the unstable Phink.  For most of the film he
seethes and bares his teeth at the camera while hissing his lines in a
performance that would give the slimiest person in the world a run for
their money.  (Note: See J.R. Bookwalter's film The Dead Next Door for
the restrained side of Scott Speigel).  
Skinned Alive is available on VHS from www.tempevideo.com in a special
pre-release remastered version.  A soundtrack is also currently
available for the film.  A DVD special edition is planned for the summer
of 2000 featuring the shorter cut of the film with commentary by J.R.
Bookwalter, cinematographer Michael Tolochko Jr., makeup effects artist
David Lange, and Scott Speigel.  There are also plans for the DVD to
contain a deleted scene (added to the original feature to pad the film
out to a feature length running time), behind the scenes footage, and an
isolated score. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Cast: Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Stellan Skarsgard, LL 
Cool J, Michael Rapaport
Written by: Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and Donna Powers
Directed by: Renny Harlin
Running Time: 105 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 31, 1999
The second movie to come down the pike this year involving killer animals 
(the other being Lake Placid), Deep Blue Sea is definitely better than the 
other film but still seems flawed.  When a research shark escapes from an 
offshore lab built inside an old German submarine base and attacks a boat, 
the corporation funding the shark project threatens to shut the scientist's 
lab down due to negative press.  It turns out that the sharks are being 
harvested to help combat Alzheimer's Disease, and one of the head scientists 
(Saffron Burrows) makes a desperate plea to let the research continue.  She 
is given the weekend to show results, and a liaison (played by Samuel L. 
Jackson) is sent along with her to report the findings.  What he finds are 
sharks with genetically enhanced intelligence and a terrible storm that 
seals off the scientists in the lab with the rampaging creatures.
I wish every scene in this movie could have been as cool as the scene where 
the shark propels the guy in the stretcher into the front glass of the lab, 
smashing the glass and flooding the room.  Unfortunately, the movie ceases 
to become inventive after that.  Sure there are a couple of plot twists that 
one doesn't see coming, but overall the film seems to be contrived. Scream 2 
already brought up the point that African American cast members always seem 
to die early on in horror films, so do we really need to hear the same 
sentiment echoed by LL Cool J midway through this film?
Renny Harlin's direction is okay during the action scenes, but the editing 
of some of the comedic moments is poor.  I'm not sure I would have laughed 
had they been edited better, but as they stand some of the jokes come off as 
awkward and stilted.  We are supposed to find comic relief in LL Cool J's 
relationship with his insult spouting
parrot, but one finds the parrot's demise in the maws of a shark funnier 
than any scene the parrot appears alive in.
Most of the film's filler cast is given the standard "I'm gonna die soon, so 
don't get too attached to me" characterization, so there's really no one to 
care about in the film.  A relationship that forms between Burrows and her 
swarthy handyman/head diver/shark wrangler rings false, and Samuel L. 
Jackson's role (which I'm assuming was
designed to be the "unknowledgeable new guy" character through which we, the 
audience, learn all the exposition) is relegated to being in awe of 
everything going on around him.
Thankfully, there is one redeeming scene (for me, anyway) where Burrows must 
remove her wet suit and use it to stand on, in her underwear, so she can 
avoid the electrical surge she is about to cause by throwing a live wire 
into the water in front of an advancing shark in order to kill it.  Too bad 
there were no scenes involving the use of jet skis in the water flooded 
hallways of the undersea lab though.  That's another sure-fire way to get on 
my good side.  [R]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted 
without permission.


Title
Review for Dick (1999)
Cast: Kirsten Dunst, Michelle Williams, Dan Hedaya, Will Ferrell, Bruce 
McCulloch, Teri Garr, Dave Foley, Jim Breuer, Ana Gasteyer, Harry Shearer, 
Saul Rubinek, Devon Gummersall, Ted McGinley, Ryan Reynolds, G.D. Spradlin, 
French Stewart
Written by: Andrew Fleming and Sheryl Longin
Directed by: Andrew Fleming
Running Time: 100 minutes
Date Reviewed: August 8, 1999
A new entry in the "revisionist history" genre of filmmaking, Dick
suggests that two not-too-bright teenage girls are the cause of the
uncovering of the nation's biggest presidential scandal.  Kirsten
Dunst and Michelle Williams star Betsy and Arlene, who while trying to
deliver a fan letter from Arlene's Watergate hotel room, accidentally
stumble across G. Gordon Liddy (played dead-on by Harry Shearer) and
the infamous break-in.  When they recognize Liddy later on during a
White House field trip, they are ushered into a conference room,
questioned as to what they know, and leave as official presidential
dog walkers.  The girls manage to unwittingly uncover every bit of the
Watergate scandal while performing their duties, but have no clue as
to what they are getting involved with.  When they discover that Nixon
(another dead-on performance by Dan Hedaya, who actually favors Nixon
slightly, unlike Anthony Hopkins) has been abusive to Checkers, the
presidential dog, thanks to the conversations that he always recorded,
they quit and become disillusioned.  During a prank phone call the
girls make to Woodward and Bernstein, events are set into motion that
eventually lead to the president's resignation.
This film starts off promisingly with an aged Woodward and Bernstein
arguing with each other on an obvious Larry King-type talk show
(featuring a cameo by French Stewart) about revealing the identity of
"Deep Throat".  From there, we are subjected to bodily function humor
and just about every bad "dick" joke one can derive from this type of
supposed comedy.  At one point, the girls are having to scream over a
high school band playing on the steps of the Lincoln Memorial.  The
band manages to stop right as Dunst screams "You have to stop letting
Dick run your life!" much to the horror of everyone standing within
earshot.  Several other variations on this wordplay surface all
throughout the film.  If this movie had been smarter I would have been
less likely to fault it's juvenile bathroom humor, but it's not.  The
film was apparently made for relatively younger people because every
major player in the Watergate scandal is introduced and shoved down
the audience's throat in the least subtle way possible.  I don't
recall Oliver Stone's Nixon having to pander to it's audience, but of
course that film wasn't a comedy aimed squarely at a 13-20 year-old
film going audience.
The only redeeming thing about this movie is it's remarkable
supporting cast.  I wanted to see more of Ferrell and McCulloch's
Woodward and Bernstein.  Those two characters are the sole basis for
my rating.  I wish they had been given more screen time, but
unfortunately, they are only relegated to the final half-hour.  Their
constant bickering and fighting over trying to get the story are a
major highlight, especially McCulloch's constant thwarting of
Ferrell's attempts to gather information from the girls (who, in the
course of the narrative are revealed as Deep Throat, so named thanks
to an ill planned trip to a porno theater by Betsy's brother).
The other members of the cast are excellent in their portrayals of
their particular characters, but are given nothing to work with.  I'd
like to see the same cast portray these characters in a script more
suited towards their comedic abilities.  As for the two leads, Dunst
and Williams can definitely do better.  They come off as what could
best be described as Romy and Michele:The Early Years in this
particular film, a highly dubious distinction at best.  Stay through
the first half of the end credits though, to see an interesting scene
involving Dunst and Williams suggestively sucking on lollipops
emblazoned with the title of the movie.
An excellent idea marred by poor execution, Dick could have been a
great movie.  Less of the juvenile humor and more of the smarter
comedy displayed by the Woodward and Bernstein scenes, could have made
this film a wonderful satire of the Nixon presidency as seen through
the eyes of two naive fifteen year olds.  As it stands though, Dick
offers nothing but what filmmaker Kevin Smith so accurately defines as
"dick and poopie" jokes.  And that, to me, does not make a funny
movie.  [PG-13]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted 
without permission.


Title
Review for Adult Version of Jekyll & Hyde, The (1972)
The Adult Version of Jekyll and Hide (1971)
Rating: 3.0 stars out of 5.0 stars
See this review the way it was meant to be seen:
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/bmadultjekyll.html
"Judging by the marks and placement, I'd say a medical man."  
  ---A coroner gives a detective his snap judgment as to who he thinks
could have strangled a bookseller, in The Adult Version of Jekyll and
Hide. 
After slimy doctor Chris Leeder (Jack Buddliner) is interrupted during
an affair with his receptionist (Rene Bond) to go on a shopping trip
with his unaware fiancee (Jennifer Brooks), he comes across an old
notebook in a rare bookshop.  The notebook belonged to the infamous Dr.
Jekyll and contains the formula that caused him to become the vicious
madman Mr. Hide.  Leeder decides it is something he must have.  He
returns to the shop after hours to retrieve the book but the old
bookseller refuses to sell it, so Leeder kills him to obtain it.  
Leeder returns home and decides to mix up a batch of the formula
himself, despite the warning that Jekyll leaves about the formula
bringing out the true nature of whomever drinks it.  Instead of becoming
a vicious madman though, Leeder becomes a sexy blond with big breasts
that likes to make out with other women and castrate drunken sailors
that are too rough with her in back alleyways of bars.  When the cops
become suspicious of Leeder's involvement with the bookseller's death,
he decides to lay low as Ms. Hide.  Unfortunately, Leeder's fiancee has
been chatting with the police and Ms. Hide doesn't care for that, so she
decides she must silence her before Leeder is caught. 
The Adult Version of Jekyll and Hide is an ultra campy soft-core
(bordering on hard-core) sex romp that was produced by the same man who
produced Herschell Gordon Lewis' Blood trilogy, David F. Friedman. 
Although Lewis was well known for being the Godfather of Gore, he and
Friedman also had a long career in making sex films.  When Lewis and
Friedman parted company after Color Me Blood Red, Lewis continued making
gore films while Friedman went back to exploitative sex films.  There
are some scenes of torture in Jekyll and Hide though, that almost seem
as if the filmmakers were trying to go for a melding of the two types of
films.  
It's amazing what movies could get away with in the seventies versus
what they get away with nowadays.  Although the original release of this
film had an X rating (for near explicit sex and a little violence) and
actually showed in theaters, in the new millennium this film would never
have been rated (as NC-17 is even too tame for this film and X no longer
exists) and it would have ended up going straight to video or never
being released at all.  The film contains sex and violence in a
combination that was rather unheard of then and is downright unspeakable
today. 
The acting in the film is what you would expect from a film made in the
late sixties/early seventies, but all of the women in it are
attractive.  Rene Bond, who plays Leeder's receptionist, was a major
player in early seventies adult films and has a following that is easily
understandable.  She is incredibly gorgeous (and nicely built) and
actually is a decent performer as well.  Considering that most films
like this contain women who are usually not known for their acting
ability, it is refreshing to find one that knows how to read a line and
actually give a performance.  Jane Tsentas does a decent turn as Ms.
Hide, displaying sex appeal and menace in equal amounts (and has the two
scene stealing moments I mentioned earlier).  Jennifer Brooks plays
Leeder's sweet-natured fiancee well and although she doesn't bear as
much flesh as the other two women, she isn't hard on the eyes either. 
Image Entertainment and Something Weird's DVD presents the film in the
full frame format and the transfer is immaculate.  The source print was
taken from an original negative and contains a few minor scratches, but
overall it looks incredible.  There are sequences that look as if they
were shot recently instead of almost thirty years ago.  The audio is
decent, but there is at least one reel that sounds as if the entire
soundtrack, dialogue and all, came off of a vinyl record album as there
are pops and hisses throughout it.  
The disc also contains a commentary track, featuring producer David L.
Friedman and Something Weird owner Mike Vraney, which is very
informative and generally free of dead areas.  Friedman recalls a great
amount of details about the making of the film (including the fact that
it was financed by a bunch of airline pilots!) and at times even talks
over Vraney's prompts. His recollection of the days when he made
exploitation films is interesting, especially when discussing how the
films would be cut differently in different states.  He's at his most
interesting though when he's discussing how people who are offended by
his films can remedy the situation without preventing the people who
DON'T get offended by them from being able to see them.  He also
discusses why the film is mistitled as Jekyll and HIDE instead of HYDE
as the Stevenson novel originally had it spelled. 
Vraney obviously has a great love for the films he releases on DVD and
this love shows, not only in the quality and subject of the films he
releases, but also in the extras that are packed onto the discs. 
Besides the commentary track, the disc also contains a theatrical
trailer and a still gallery of exploitation films (with such great
titles as Ramrodder and Thar She Blows).  With this film and others like
it, and the release of H.G. Lewis's films, Image and Something Weird
solidify their presence as one of the best purveyors of classic cult
cinema in the US. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
Cast: Bruce Willis, Samuel L. Jackson, Robin Wright Penn, Spencer Treat
Clark 
Written and Directed by: M. Night Shyamalan 
Running Time: 122 minutes 
Bruce Willis and Sixth Sense director M. Night Shyamalan re-team to tell
the story of David Dunne (Willis), a stadium security guard who has been
having some problems at home that are affecting his relationship with
his wife and child.  On a return trip from New York where he was trying
to get a job, Dunne is in a horrible train accident that he is the only
survivor of.  To make things even stranger, Dunne has also escaped the
accident completely unscathed.  
A comic book art dealer named Elijah Price (Samuel L. Jackson), who was
born with a degenerative bone disease that causes his bones to be so
brittle that they break constantly, has been seeking out someone like
Dunne his entire life.  Price felt that there had to be someone exactly
the opposite of him... someone whose bones would be so strong that they
would never break.  Price contacts Dunne and convinces him to come down
to his gallery for a talk where he suggests that Dunne could quite
possibly be something akin to a superhero from the comic books Price
used to read when he was a child.  Dunne doesn't believe him at first,
but Price assists him in discovering his "powers" and helps him hone his
craft until he discovers what his true calling really is. 
Writer/director M. Night Shyamalan had a tough act to follow with his
sleeper hit The Sixth Sense.  How exactly does one follow up on one of
the biggest and most popular thrillers in recent years?  For Shyamalan,
the answer must have come as easy to him as nuclear physics does to
kindergartners.  Does this new film measure up to his breakthrough box
office smash, though?  The answer to that question is not a very easy
one, either. 
As far as pacing goes, The Sixth Sense seemed almost interminable.  It
wasn't until the surprise ending was revealed that I realized the film
was actually intentionally (and perfectly) paced in order to give the
audience ample time to re-connect all of the information they had seen
once the climax had been reached.  For Unbreakable, Shyamalan gave the
film a much more satisfying pace which, in many ways, blows away the
film that had come before.  The story moves along at a steady pace and
Shyamalan's direction is excellent, with the camera almost constantly
moving.  There are tons of great shots in the film, not least of which
is a conversation that opens the film between Willis' character and
another train passenger.  The shot seems as though it were filmed like
we were watching the two talk from between the train seats and the
camera steadily glides back and forth between the two actors as they
speak. 
Also very impressive is the film's score by James Newton Howard (who
also scored Shyamalan's Sixth Sense and the similar film Stir of Echoes,
as well as this year's Dinosaur).  Several of the scenes are driven by a
very catchy beat and help to increase the tempo of the film.  One of the
best examples of this is a scene in which Dunne goes into a train
station to "exercise" his powers.  The music, in combination with the
stellar visuals, really go a long way towards making this an incredible
movie.  If there was any one soundtrack I would make a must purchase
this year, this one would be it. 
The film also boasts some great performances, including a precocious
child actor trying to vie for the Oscar throne left vacant by Haley Joel
Osment.  Willis turns in a great performance as the sad sack Dunne, who
just can't seem to figure out why he's been depressed for the last few
years.  His character almost seems pathetic when we first meet him, but
he eventually grows into his own under Elijah's tutelage.  Jackson is
one of the better actors of our time, and here he turns in yet another
great performance as the ever injured Elijah.  Though his hairstyle is
absurd, Jackson seems to infuse such a great deal of pain into his role
that the mortar board hairdo can easily be overlooked.  Robin Wright
Penn's role seems slightly underwritten, but she still manages to get
across the intense hurt of her character's need for love from her
husband and her desire to make things work again.  Spencer Treat Clark,
as the Dunne's young son Jeremy, shows that Shyamalan still has a knack
for picking young actors, and he turns in one of the most competent
performances in the film.  Out of all the characters, Jeremy's is
perhaps the most emotional, and Clark does a great job with the role. 
Where the film does lose points though, is during its "surprise"
ending.  Shyamalan has said in interviews that he was going to do an
ending that blew away the one presented by The Sixth Sense, but I found
myself saying "that was it?!" when Unbreakable revealed its own ending. 
It's not that the ending is bad, it's just that the ending doesn't quite
have the emotional punch that the other film's did.  Plus, it almost
seems like it sets itself up for sequels (and I won't reveal the ending
here, but you'll understand what I mean when you see it). 
Essentially, what all of this means is that Shyamalan has made another
good film with Unbreakable.  The only real problem is that the ending
doesn't quite fill the shadow left by its predecessor.  As long as it
isn't held to the standard that Sixth Sense set (which it ultimately
will be), it should be a remarkably well liked film.  One thing seems
clear, though.  Shyamalan definitely has an affinity for comic books
that he would like to share with the world and many comic book fans will
also delight the vision he presents in this film. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Dead Next Door, The (1988)
Cast: Peter Ferry, Bogdan Pecic, Michael Grossi, Joile Jackunas, Robert
Kokai, Floyd Ewing Jr., Roger Graham, Maria Markovic, Jon Killough,
Scott Spiegel, Jeff Welch, Michael Todd, J.R. Bookwalter, Jennifer
Mullen, Joe Wedlake, Lester Clark, Barbara Gay, Bruce Campbell (voice
only) 
Written and Directed by: J.R. Bookwalter 
Running Time: 81 minutes 
Five years after a virus has caused the dead to rise and walk the Earth
in search of human flesh, a squad of zombie hunters (known fittingly as
the Zombie Squad) are working to rid the nation of the undead.  While
taking care of some business in Ohio, the Zombie Squad stumbles upon a
religious sect that has other plans for the living corpses.  It's up to
Raimi (Peter Ferry) and the rest of his squad members to figure out what
the cult is attempting to do and stop them before they are allowed to
get away with it. 
An incredibly ambitious film directed by a then 19 year old J.R.
Bookwalter and financed by an uncredited Sam Raimi, The Dead Next Door
has an epic feel that it is actually able to pull off (thanks in large
part to the hundreds of extras that agreed to participate and some
kindly folks in Washington that allowed them to shoot on the steps of
the Lincoln Memorial and on the lawn of the White House).  Bookwalter
was able to assemble a large enough cast that the film never seems as if
it is low budget at all.  In fact, only the use of 8mm film (and a
couple of weak performances) gives away the fact that the film's budget
was nowhere near even some of the lowest budgeted independent films.  
Sam Raimi's connection doesn't just end with his production of the
film.  Penultimate cult star Bruce Campbell of Raimi's classic Evil Dead
trilogy does a vocal turn here dubbing over the lines of what sounds
like the character of Raimi (and possibly one other character).  Also,
Evil Dead II co-writer Scott Spiegel makes an appearance as an ill-fated
member of the Zombie Squad early on in the film.  The film Evil Dead
itself gets a tribute early on in the film with several characters
watching the film on TV and hyping some of the more famous sequences to
other characters.  
Note: Several characters are also named after other horror film
directors, most notably the character of Raimi, but there is also a
Commander Carpenter and a Dr. Savini that show up in the film.  For some
reason, only those three directors are used, but there's an interesting
parallel between Jon Killough's character of Vincent and his
more-than-a-passing resemblance to director Tim Burton (the irony being
that Burton's first short film was entitled Vincent).  I don't know if
the reference was intentional, but it is clever nonetheless. 
The cast is fleshed out by a number of people who have become regulars
in other Bookwalter directed and produced films.  Barbara Gay has a
cameo as a nurse and went on to appear as Whinnie in Skinned Alive and
makes an appearance in The Sandman (under the name Barbara
Katz-Norrod).  The creator of the zombie virus, Dr. Bow, is played by
Lester Clark, who also appeared in Skinned Alive and had a character
named after him in Polymorph.  Skinned Alive director Jon Killough
appears as the aforementioned Vincent.  Two other cast members, Floyd
Ewing Jr. and Scott Spiegel, also had major roles in Skinned Alive,
fully solidifying the connection to that film.  
Some better than average special effects also lift this film high above
its low budget roots.  Several very inventive puppets complete the image
of severed zombie heads swallowing fingers (with the finger coming out
of the open throat hole), zombies eating rats, and even walking cadavers
displaying levels of decay that an actor in makeup wouldn't be able to. 
Plus, Bookwalter's expertise at editing allows for some effective shots
of people being hit with machetes or ripped to shreds by hordes of
mindless killing machines. 
The Dead Next Door is available on VHS from www.tempevideo.com.  The
transfer is overly dark, which makes for a bit more of a distraction
than there should be, but an adjustment of the brightness on your set
should take care of most of the problem.  The video contains a "making
of" segment that details what Bookwalter and his cast and crew went
through to make the film and even contains some interesting commercials
for the release of the original videocassette (one featuring Bookwalter
himself showing what happens if you decide to pirate his film and
another that features Barbara Gay again as an old woman who desperately
wants a copy of the film from her local video store).  There is also a
discussion of the proposed sequel to the film that sounds like a good
idea, especially after viewing The Dead Next Door's surprise ending. A
DVD is set for release this summer and it is proposed that the disc will
contain commentary, the original cast audio track, and a few other
select goodies.  
Well worth checking out, The Dead Next Door is a stellar effort and
worthy of the cult status it has achieved in the fifteen years since its
first release.  I've seen it said about Bookwalter before, but I can
also attest that given a huge budget he could really turn some heads. 
He has a great grasp on editing and direction and is even currently
working on a Full Moon film.  I hope he does get around to a sequel to
his first film ever because I'd be interested to see where he takes the
story from here.  Given the talent he has already displayed I'm sure it
will be something worth talking about. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Third World Cop (1999)
Cast: Paul Campbell, Mark Danvers, Carl Bradshaw, Audrey Reid, Winston
Bell, Lenford Salmon, Desmond Ballentine (a.k.a. Ninjaman)
Written by: Suzanne Fenn, Chris Browne, and Chris Salewicz
Directed by: Chris Browne
Running Time: 98 minutes
`We run tings. Tings don't run we.'
    -Sound advice from Capone (Paul Campbell) to his squaddie (or
partner), Floyd (Winston Bell).
Jamaican film, shot entirely on video, featuring a standard cop movie
plot mixed with a dash of John Woo-styled brotherhood morals (and a
little gunplay).  Capone, a tough as nails super cop, gets a transfer
back to his hometown of Kingston after successfully taking down some
gangsters that have broken into his home (while he was with his lady)
and killed his partner in front of him.  When he arrives, he discovers
that the ghetto where he grew up has gotten worse, thanks mainly to the
crime boss Wonie (Jamaican film veteran Carl Bradshaw), so named because
his left hand has been amputated and replaced by a grasping hook). 
Capone discovers that Wonie has been smuggling guns inside shipments of
charity supplies for the area churches and, much to his disappointment,
also finds out his childhood friend Ratty (Mark Danvers) has been
helping him.  Torn between doing his job and protecting his best friend,
Capone must make some hard decisions in order to make things right
again.
Directed deftly by first time Jamaican filmmaker Chris Browne (assistant
director for such American films as How Stella Got Her Groove Back and
Instinct), one hardly notices the film was shot on video after a while. 
Shots are handled so efficiently that they quickly take on the nuances
of the aforementioned John Woo films, although the action isn't as
hyperkinetic as most of Woo's films are.  The action scenes are handled
with a kind of flair though, and eventually begin to take on a life of
their own (beyond the Hong Kong films that they are obviously patterned
after).  The make-up effects are particularly good in these scenes as
well, with flawless squib work on display from the effects team.
The cast is superb and listening to their dialogue, spoken with thick
Jamaican accents (half of which have to be subtitled because of their
extensive use of slang), just adds to the interest.  Paul Campbell, as
the `loose cannon' Capone, essays his role perfectly, displaying the
right amount of menace and compassion at the right times.  Mark Danvers
evokes sympathy as Ratty, the part-time gun smuggler who is also trying
to help the community by building football fields and organizing block
parties to bring people together.  Unfortunately, Carl Bradshaw is given
the least to do and his character as the crime boss seems ineffective
(largely because his underlings seem to run all over him), but then
again, that could be the way his character was intended to be portrayed.
The music in the film is composed of all reggae songs, and the
soundtrack was produced by Grammy Award winning artists, Sly and Robbie
(who have worked with the likes of The Rolling Stones, Maxi Priest, Bob
Dylan, James Brown, Grace Jones, Herbie Hancock, Bootsy Collins, and
Carly Simon among others).  The end credit song, `We Run Tings', by the
group Red Dragon, is pretty decent and carries on the theme of the movie
established early on by the quote that opens this review.  Oddly enough,
Desmond Ballentine (who plays the character Deportee) is well known as a
pioneer in the realm of `gangsta' reggae as the performer Ninjaman, and
he doesn't contribute a single song to the film (that I could see),
which is virtually unheard of here in the US.
At the time of this writing, Third World Cop has been put into limited
theatrical release in the US, coming off of a six-month box-office
breaking run in Jamaica, where it holds the position as highest grossing
film of all time (bringing in $21 million in Jamaica, which is roughly
$500,000 US).  Palm Pictures (the company that released the offbeat, but
entertaining Six-String Samurai) is the company releasing the film and
considering that their main focus is the DVD market, I can imagine that
a disc will be available once the film has left theaters.  Chris
Blackwell, founder of Palm Pictures, was also involved in the production
of another Jamaican box-office smash in 1981 entitled Countryman, so I'd
say he has a pretty good track record.
Overall, Third World Cop is a pretty entertaining homage to the films of
John Woo, Ringo Lam, Tsui Hark, and many other action films by directors
from Hong Kong.  If action films are your thing and you don't mind
intermittent subtitles, then you can't go wrong with this film.  The
performances and the story are solid (if only a little cliched) and the
action is tight.  I'm not sure what the other Jamaican films released in
that country are like, but apparently Third World Cop's honors are well
deserved.
Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Dellamorte Dellamore (1994)
Retitling of the Italian black comedy/horror Dellamorte Dellamore
(meaning "of Death and Love") and based on the novel by Tiziano Sclavi,
Cemetery Man features Rupert Everett as Francesco Dellamorte, operator
of Buffalora Cemetery.  Whenever someone new is buried in the cemetery,
seven days later they return from the grave, hungry for flesh.
Dellamorte and his mentally handicapped assistant, Gnaghi
(Hadji-Lazaro), must shoot them in the head and rebury them in order to
keep them from doing any harm.  Between replantings, Dellamorte tries to
make his best friend's seemingly perfect life miserable, most of the
younger townspeople taunt him because they think he is impotent, and the
mayor won't listen to his plight involving the graveyard. 
When the most incredibly beautiful woman Dellamorte has ever seen (Anna
Falchi) appears at his workplace to mourn the passing of her
substantially older husband, he immediately falls in love.  She rebukes
him at first, but finally warms up to him, and they end up making love
on her dead husband's grave ("I never kept any secrets from him" she
explains when questioned as to why).  Unfortunately for her, it's been
seven days since her husband's passing, and he returns from the grave
taking a large bite out of her arm before Dellamorte manages to ram a
large metal cross through his head.  Dellamorte incorrectly thinks she
is dead, so when she seemingly comes back to life he shoots her, again
incorrectly thinking it has killed her when all it did was graze her. 
Dellamorte's life then turns upside down more than it already was.  His
assistant falls in love with still-living severed head of the mayor's
daughter, a busload of dead boy scouts comes back to life (still trying
to rub two sticks together!), and two women who look exactly like his
previous love suddenly enter his life.  Dellamorte snaps and kills the
teenagers who taunted him and three prostitutes.  All of the murders get
blamed on his best friend, who confesses to those crimes and the murder
of his own wife and children because he also snaps under the constant
barrage of pessimism from Dellamorte.  When Dellamorte tries to leave
town to get away from all the madness, what he finds humbles but
doesn't surprise him.  
Cemetery Man is currently available only on videocassette and laserdisc,
neither of which is letterboxed, effectively ruining many of the jokes
and impressive visuals that were seen on the big screen.  Director
Michele Soavi uses the gothic statuary and shadows of the cemetery to
great effect, and some of his wonderful visually striking imagery is
lost in the transfer.  A Japanese import was available letterboxed, but
unfortunately, is no longer in print.  It's a shame a decent letterboxed
copy isn't available, because a movie this great deserves better. 
Unceremoniously dumped into theaters with a poor advertising campaign
that inaccurately reflected the tone of the film, Cemetery Man was
virtually ignored at the box office, then was unceremoniously dumped
onto home video.  
Cemetery Man was shot and dubbed in English (as many Italian films are)
using the original actors, who just post synched every line, so those of
you who don't prefer to read subtitles have nothing to worry about.  I
highly recommend this quirky little film to anyone looking for something
a little different in his or her movie watching experience, especially
if you are tired of the milieu of teen horror romps that Hollywood has
churned out in the wake of Scream.  It's nice to find a well written
horror film that can combine gore, comedy, and human psychology as
deftly as this film does.  Originally presented in 1.85:1 (but good luck
finding a copy of that anywhere). 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for E tu vivrai nel terrore - L'aldilŕ (1981)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Catriona MacColl, David Warbeck, Antoine Saint John, Sarah Keller,
Giovanni De Nava, Veronica Lazar, Anthony Flees, Al Cliver, Michele
Mirabella, Gianpaolo Saccarola, Maria Pia Marsala, Laura De Marchi 
Written by: Lucio Fulci, Dardano Sacchetti, and Giorgio Mariuzzo 
Directed by: Lucio Fulci 
Running Time: 89 minutes 
"We just hope we don't bore the s@#! out of you." 
--- Actor David Warbeck expresses unfounded fears over his (sadly) one
and only commentary track performance on the excellent DVD for the cult
film The Beyond. 
A young woman Liza (Catriona MacColl) inherits an old hotel in Louisiana
where a painter (Antoine Saint John) that was guarding the gateway to
hell was viciously murdered by a lynch mob almost sixty years earlier. 
As handymen fix up the hotel for her, the crucified painter is
accidentally unearthed, causing the gateway to hell to swing wide and
allow the dead to rise and walk the Earth.  With the assistance of a
doctor named John McCabe (David Warbeck), Liza must find a mystical book
that may seal the portal and finally set things right in the world.  In
their way though, stands a legion of zombies lead by the undead painter,
who has all sorts of nasty surprises in store for those who stand in his
way. 
The Beyond is, most certainly, the late Italian horror film guru Lucio
Fulci's masterpiece.  The plot may initially sound like a rehash of the
Evil Dead trilogy, but make no mistake about its origins.  This film was
made just prior to the completion and release of the original Sam Raimi
classic and contains more of a metaphysical slant than the more visceral
cult trilogy (though the metaphysical nature of the film is upstaged by
the mind-blowing ending of Michele Soavi's Cemetery Man).  The film also
contains little humor, which also sets it apart from Raimi's films. 
We may not have been able to see this film the way it was intended if it
hadn't have been for two fanatical fans of the film and the recent
interest in Italian cinema.  In 1995, Sylvester Stallone's son Sage and
Army of Darkness editor Bob Murawski decided that there were some
classic underground, horror, and gore films that had been released over
the last twenty or more years that had not been getting the recognition
they deserved.  Thus was formed Grindhouse Releasing, a company
specializing in the restoration and release of classic cult films
theatrically and on home video (not to mention having the coolest logo
of any releasing studio in the country).  The first film they obtained
was the Lucio Fulci gorefest, The Beyond. 
When this film was initially released to US theaters it was titled Seven
Doors of Death, and most of the traumatic footage of death and
dismemberment had been edited out.  This caused many to feel that the
film's narrative was lacking and that the director had to be a hack. 
With the assistance of Quentin Tarantino and his own production company
Rolling Thunder Pictures, a deal was struck that actually allowed
Fulci's film to finally be shown in the US in its full uncut version.  
And what an uncut version this film is too!  Although it doesn't come
anywhere near Peter Jackson's over-the-top gore circus Dead Alive
(a.k.a. Braindead), The Beyond showcases some of the most revoltingly
gory special effects ever seen in a film.  The opening scene, shot in a
sepia-tone coloration that gives it the feel of an old photograph,
features a chain-whipping sequence lifted straight out of Don't Torture
a Duckling (though the one presented here is far more graphic in its
depiction) followed by a crucifixion and the scalding and melting of a
man's face with quicklime.  What follows is more bloody face melting,
eye gouging, and exploding heads than many Italian films put together. 
The effects aren't top of the line, but they are very effective. 
In fact, the only truly ineffective effect still packs a slight bit of a
wallop.  The scene entails a man named Martin (Michele Mirabella)
researching the grounds that the old hotel was built on (featuring the
basement where the painter was nailed to the wall... a virtual
impossibility since Louisiana is below sea level and no basements exist
throughout the state).  Martin accidentally falls off of the ladder he
was standing on while reading the old blueprints of the hotel and is
immediately set upon by killer tarantulas.  Many of the spiders in the
scene are most certainly real, but a few are obviously fake.  The fake
spiders then proceed to eat the flesh off of the Martin's face, which
looks very much like a dummy head rigged to spew blood and lose flesh. 
Where the scene does work though is a truly gross scene where one of the
spiders is seen rooting around underneath Martin's eyelid, finally
dragging the eyeball out with him when he backs out of the cavity. 
Note: Fulci makes his Hitchcock-like cameo during the aforementioned
scene as a town clerk who allows Martin to do his own research while he
takes a union-mandated early lunch break.  
The Beyond was intended as the second film in a proposed trilogy of
films called the Seven Gates Trilogy (the first film being the
entertainingly graphic City of the Living Dead).  In fact, The Beyond
was actually supposed to be much different from the finished product and
was re-worked to expand on the themes set up in the first film when the
German distributors financing the project demanded there be zombies in
the script (when there originally weren't any).  The Seven Gates Trilogy
was never completed although one of the stars of The Beyond, David
Warbeck, wrote a treatment for an actual sequel to The Beyond itself
that picked up right where the first film left off, but he passed away
before it could come to fruition and the project was halted. 
If the film alone doesn't satisfy your Fulci cravings, then the ultimate
Fulci fans Blackest Heart Media (www.blackestheart.com) have a bit of a
surprise for you.  Well known for their excellent graphic novel
adaptations of Fulci films, the gang don't disappoint again with a
wonderful comic version of The Beyond.  The Blackest Heart gang have
mastered the feel of Fulci's universe and even expand on some of the
character motivations, giving the film an even deeper subtext.  Included
in the comic are a forward by novelist Douglas E. Winter and three great
essays centering around horror comics (written by Steve Bissette), the
film itself (written by Blackest Heart owner Shawn "Smith" Lewis), and
the film's excellent music conducted by Fabio Frizzi (written by Stephen
Romano). 
Speaking of the music, the graphic novel also comes with a remastered CD
soundtrack for the film, exclusive to its release.  The soundtrack
contains the entire score, as well as great dialogue clips from the film
("You ungodly warlock!"). 
Anchor Bay Entertainment has outdone themselves with an excellent DVD
special edition of The Beyond.  The film is presented in the aspect
ratio of 2.35:1 (enhanced for 16x9 televisions) and is a wonder to
behold.  There are no visible scratches on the print used for the
transfer and the film looks as if it were shot only a few short years
ago, instead of almost twenty.  Features on the disc include the
international trailer, the German trailer, the US theatrical re-release
trailer, a music video directed by Jim Van Bebber (of Deadbeat at Dawn
fame) featuring clips from the film and a band that is apparently
screaming lyrics based on the film, the original color version of the
German opening credits (made because the German releasing studio didn't
appreciate the artistic vision of the director), and a still gallery
that also includes actual video footage of Fulci on the set of Demonia
and footage of he and David Warbeck answering questions at a convention. 
The most entertaining feature on the disc is a commentary track by stars
Catriona MacColl and David Warbeck.  The track had originally been
recorded for the laserdisc release (and Warbeck was actually very ill
during the taping and died soon afterwards, though you can never tell by
his voice and attitude during the track).  The two seem to have a blast
reminiscing about the film and are actually surprised at the fans they
have garnered due to it.  All throughout, they crack jokes and discuss
Fulci with a high regard for his talent and the stories they have to
tell are fascinating and hilarious.  MacColl does seem a little
uncomfortable during the gore scenes (as she hasn't seen the film in
many years), but she always remains professional.  Commentary highlight:
When Warbeck reveals that a joke he had made on set (reloading his gun
by dropping bullets down the barrel) actually made it into the final cut
of the film... along with MacColl's bemused on-screen reaction when she
sees him doing it.  
As an added bonus, there are a few hidden easter eggs to be found.  The
first hidden goody is located on the "Images from the Beyond" menu
page.  From the Menu icon at the bottom of the page, click over to the
Mark of Eibon on the left to access an extremely gory trailer for the
Fulci film Cat in the Brain.  The second hidden goody is located on the
Audio Setup page.  From the Resume icon at the bottom of the page, click
over to the Mark of Eibon on the left to access the original opening of
the 1981 US version of The Beyond (entitled Seven Doors of Death and
credited to director "Louis Fuller"). 
Note: Anchor Bay also has devised a most unusual and hilarious method of
promotion for the film.  Screener copies of the DVD were sent out inside
a specially created vomit bag proclaiming "the intense and shocking
nature of the film" and how "individuals with sensitive constitutions
may experience stomach distress".  The bag also asks "Can you take it?"
and lists the day and date of the film's release on VHS and DVD.  A
funny message at the bottom of the bag warns against over-filling. 
Though few will actually get to see this promotional item, it is
wonderfully inspired and was a highlight of receiving the disc. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger - Widescreen25
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Editor - The Jacksonville Film Journal
Specializing in DVDs, home video, cult favorites and the indie scene.
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Cast: Christian Bale, Willem Dafoe, Jared Leto, Reese Witherspoon,
Samantha Mathis, Chloë Sevigny, Guinevere Turner 
Written by: Mary Harron and Guinevere Turner 
Directed by: Mary Harron 
Running Time: 100 minutes 
Set in the late 80's at the height of yuppie excess and based on the
book by Bret Easton Ellis (who explored the same themes in another book
which was also made into a movie, Less Than Zero), American Psycho puts
a new spin on the yuppie "genre" that Ellis helped to create.  Christian
Bale is perfectly cast as Patrick Bateman, a high powered yuppie who
hides a terrible secret from his fiancée and his colleagues.  It seems
that Bateman is a serial killer and, unfortunately for his
contemporaries, his tenuous grasp on reality is starting to slip.  As he
tries to balance his meticulous daily routines with slaughtering
co-workers and prostitutes and hiding their bodies, his mental fabric
slowly begins to unravel.  
I was first introduced to the novel when I was still in high school.  I
read an Associated Press article in our local Sunday newspaper detailing
the problems Ellis was having getting his novel published due to the
controversial violence in it. As usual when anything is controversial I
try to seek it out, but I soon forgot about the novel and didn't end up
thinking about it again until I stumbled across it a couple of years
later at a bookstore.  I picked it up and read it, but was ultimately
disappointed because it left more questions than answers.  The movie has
a similar effect, but at least it's less cryptic than Ellis' novel.  For
once, a film has actually turned out to be better than the novel it was
based on.  
Both the book and the film open with Bateman describing his fastidious
morning preparations (down to exactly what facial scrubs and exfoliating
creams he uses) but the novel seems to concentrate more on these
excesses throughout.  The movie continues to touch upon these things but
makes more of a point to immerse us in Bateman's impending madness than
to detail things as painstakingly as the novel does.  As a result, the
film is immensely more entertaining.  
Lions Gate seems to be the studio champion of controversial films
(having picked up Kevin Smith's Catholic-rattling Dogma) and here with
American Psycho there is no difference.  Screenwriters Mary Harron and
Guinevere Turner had the unenviable task of trying to take a novel about
yuppies filled with graphic violence and sex and make a marketable film
out of it.  Some cuts had to be made to the finished film to keep from
getting an NC-17, mainly involving a sex scene comprising Bateman and
two women, and initial reports said the film was unwatchable. 
Thankfully, it IS watchable and Harron and Turner have made one of the
most scathingly satirical films this side of South Park:Bigger, Longer &
Uncut.  
Side Note #1: Co-writer Guinevere Turner also makes an appearance in the
film as an ill-fated acquaintance of Bateman's who, after Bateman
suggests that she start making out with a female prostitute, proclaims
that she's not a lesbian nor has any interest in it.  The ironic humor
of the scene stems from the fact that Turner (the writer/director of the
film Go Fish and who also assisted Kevin Smith with parts of his script
for Chasing Amy) is a lesbian.  It's a subtle in-joke and it's one I
found to be pretty humorous.  
Despite having a rather high profile supporting cast of young
up-and-comers (including Reese Witherspoon), most of the roles are a
waste and are the equivalent of extended billed cameos.  The real draw
here is Christian Bale and his over-the-top performance as Patrick
Bateman.  Whenever I read a novel I always try to imagine what it would
be like as a movie and who would be perfect to cast as the characters. 
I always had a hard time trying to decide who I would cast as Bateman,
but I never thought Bale would deliver a performance as perfect as his
ends up being.  To say Bale runs away with the character is a vast
understatement and he proves that he's as adept at chewing scenery as Al
Pacino or Rod Steiger.  One sequence in particular, involving Bateman
describing his love for Huey Lewis and the News' song "Hip to Be Square"
right before burying an axe in a co-worker's head, features one of the
most eccentric and kinetic performances I have ever seen on film.  
Side Note #2: Despite the fact that Huey Lewis' "Hip to be Square" and a
pair of Phil Collins songs appear in the film, don't expect to see them
on the soundtrack release.  Huey Lewis expressly requested that his
song, featured in a rather large set piece in the film (much akin to the
use of "Stuck in the Middle with You" in Reservoir Dogs), not be
included on any soundtrack release.  I'm assuming that Collins requested
the same.  On a similar note, Whitney Houston's cover of "The Greatest
Love of All" is also involved in a scene comparable to the other two and
it is very obvious that it isn't the Houston version at all but merely
an instrumental version culled from an unknown source.  Apparently,
Houston wasn't as open about the use of her song as the others were.  
A bigger controversy than the violence and sex has been brewing since
the film's release: that of whether or not Patrick has actually
committed the crimes we have viewed during the course of the film. 
Don't look to the book for any answers because it will only serve to
confuse you more.  Several web sites have been dedicated to the subject
but I'm still undecided.  There is evidence both for and against but the
most scathing evidence against comes from a scene near the end of the
film where Bateman goes on a killing spree taking out cops, old ladies,
and cleaning staff with equal gusto.  The scene seemed very dream-like
and as absurd as the action films it suddenly seems to be parodying (as
an example, Bateman blows up a police car VERY cinematically after
firing several shots from a handgun in the general direction of the
car).  I kept waiting for Bateman to wake up and for the film to
continue on from there, but Bateman never does wake up and the whole
sequence, though comic, throws the film off-balance (which I suppose was
the intention).  
Other than the few flaws I have mentioned, American Psycho is an
incredibly entertaining film (although you may not leave the movie fully
understanding whether or not what has just transpired actually occurred
in Bateman's reality).  I think this movie is destined for greatness as
a cult film and deserves the spot it will take as such.  It may not
change anyone's life, but it will certainly have an effect.  I know I
will certainly hear "Hip to be Square" in a different context the next
time I hear it.  [R]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Cast: Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Haley Joel Osment, 
Donnie Wahlberg
Written and Directed by: M. Night Shyamalan
Running Time: 107 minutes
Date Reviewed: August 9, 1999
Bruce Willis stars as Malcolm, an award winning child psychologist who 
discovers one night that one of his former patients is still suffering from 
inner demons.  The now grown man breaks into his apartment while he and his 
wife (Olivia Williams from Rushmore) are celebrating his award, shoots 
Malcolm in the stomach, then takes his own life.  Almost nine months later, 
Malcolm discovers Cole (Haley Joel Osment, in a brilliant performance), 
another young man
afflicted with the same turmoil as his former patient.  He takes on the 
child's case in the hope of redeeming himself for botching up the previous 
one, alienating his wife in the process.  He soon discovers that they boy 
can see and speak to the dead, and his life becomes forever turned upside 
down.
Although the first hour is very slow, The Sixth Sense turns out to be a very 
powerful and moving film.  I was expecting this film to be Mercury Rising 2, 
but was astonished to discover an extremely well plotted out little thriller 
with an outstandingly satisfying ending.  You'll find yourself mentally 
retracing your steps through the film
to see if you actually saw what you think you did once the credits roll.  I 
must give M. Night Shyamalan a lot of credit for a brilliantly written 
screenplay.
The cast should also be given a lot of credit for making the movie as solid 
as it is.  A lesser cast could have made this film a joke.  Bruce Willis 
portrays his character perfectly, balancing his need to help Cole and his 
agony over his strained relationship with his wife skillfully.  Haley Joel 
Osment shines as nine year old Cole, showing patience in his character that 
few young actors these days can pull off.  Toni Collette, looking markedly 
different from her pathetic character in Muriel's Wedding, gives a strong 
performance as Cole's mother, who is trying to cope with both her son's 
"illness" and the passing of her mother.  Finally, Olivia Williams deftly 
portrays a woman having to struggle with a husband who's not around and 
flirtations with a co-worker that could lead to a begrudgingly
accepted end.
It's a shame that they show Cole's abilities in the trailer, because the 
movie takes close to forty minutes to get around to doing the same, so we 
already know what's going on before most of the rest of the cast does.  In 
retrospect though, the forty minute set-up is essential to enjoying the end 
of the film, so I have fewer complaints
now then I did while I was watching the film.  I'm glad that the run of 
teen-styled horror films has passed and filmmakers are starting to make more 
adult fare.  Films like this, the similarly themed Stir of Echoes, and 
countless others to be released later in the year should make for a pretty 
entertaining close to 1999.  [PG-13]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted 
without permission.


Title
Review for Cannibal Holocaust (1979)
Cast: Starring Robert Kerman, Francesca Ciardi, Perry Pirkanen, Luca
Barbareschi, Salvatore Basile, Ricardo Fuentes, Gabriel Yorke, Paolo
Paoloni, Pio Di Savoia, and Luigina Rocchi 
Written by: Gianfranco Clerici 
Directed by: Ruggero Deodato 
Running Time: 95 minutes 
Tell me if this story sounds familiar?  Four documentarians venture into
the wilds of South America to film ancient tribes of cannibals as they
go about their hedonistic activities.  The film crew disappears and two
months later their footage is found and the truth about what evil has
befallen them is revealed.  If you said that it sounds like The Blair
Witch Project then you would be correct.  Only this is Cannibal
Holocaust and it came out twenty years before Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sánchez had even learned how to hold a camera. 
The story of Cannibal Holocaust is told slightly more cinematically,
with Professor Monroe (Robert Kerman) leading his own crew into the
jungles to find out where the previous crew has gone.  In his journeys
he is witness to many of the inhumanities that the cannibals inflict on
others and even their own.  Some harrowing scenes including the real
killing of a giant turtle (for the use of food, but still incredibly
hard to watch) and several scenes of torture visited upon tribe members
that have broken various laws.  He is appalled by the savagery he sees
displayed by the natives, but has no idea what is in store for him. 
Professor Monroe locates the footage, and thinks he has found the
remains of the film crew, but he is not for sure until he begins viewing
the footage.  While on a lecture tour detailing his journey, some TV
stations express interest in airing the lost footage.  Shocked by what
he has already seen, Monroe must convince the network heads that the
footage is too graphic to be televised (this was before cable TV, after
all).  In the end, he makes his point and then some. 
As Monroe and the network staff watch the footage, they soon learn who
the true barbarians are.  They watch in horror as the documentary film
crew round up an entire tribe in a hut and set the hut on fire, forcing
anyone who tries to run out back in.  They see they men in the crew rape
a helpless native woman who is later killed by killed by her tribe
because she is no longer pure.  The crew also captures on film an
impromptu abortion and subsequent killing of an unborn child and its
mother.  It's not pleasant viewing material. 
The final horror comes when Monroe learns the true fate of the crew.  In
retaliation for the rape of one of their tribeswomen, the cannibals hunt
down the crew members and, one by one, all four of them are horribly
murdered and eaten in front of the still running camera lens.  As an
added insult they also rape the only female of the group, Faye Daniels
(Francesca Ciardi), before they eat her.  The film is immediately
ordered destroyed. 
Cannibal Holocaust is by no means a film for anyone with a weak
stomach.  Although Blair Witch follows the "lost footage" almost scene
for scene (including the now famous "last shot taken from the viewpoint
of as fallen camera"), there is no mistaking that Holocaust's footage is
the more graphic of the two.  This is an extreme warning: Cannibal
Holocaust is not for children or the squeamish! 
The movie is starkly filmed and the bleakness of the footage adds the
the realistic nature of story.  Although the footage with any actual
humans being killed is faked, any scene in which an animal is killed is
done for real.  I'm not sure if this was done in order to make anyone
watching it think that the human deaths were real as well, but they're
there and its hard stuff to watch.  Very creepy stuff. The parallels
that Clerici's script draws between us and the cannibals is also very
effective in conveying just how close we are to our primal natures and
who the true savages really are. 
Another effective aspect of the film is the score by Riz Ortolani.  At
times haunting and other times beautiful, Ortolani's score is perfect
for the tone of the film.  During the sequence where the film crew burns
the tribe in the hut, the score takes on an tone that's almost that of a
sweeping romance.  The effect is incredibly disturbing. 
Cannibal Holocaust is currently not available on any legitimate video
format.  A laserdisc was released by Cult Videos in 1997, featuring an
interview with director Deodato containing a photograph from an
uncompleted "piranha" scene, the original theatrical trailer, an
isolated score on the analog track, and a mini poster.  Several copies
of film have surfaced on video cassette, but I'm not sure which ones are
licensed and which are bootlegs.  The laserdisc presents the film in its
uncut version at a 1:85.1 aspect ratio and was shot and dubbed mostly in
English like many other Italian films.  Adventurous movie-goers may want
to give this film a try, but I suggest all others stay away.
Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Drivetime, The (1995)
Cast: Michael Douglas, Kristen Kosmas, Michael George, Susan Mansfield,
Michael Donovan, Joel Gilman, Jim Jackson, Camille Hildebrandt 
Written and Directed by: Antero Alli 
Running Time: 88 minutes 
In the year 2023, a librarian named Flux (Michael Douglas, however not
the lucky one married to Catherine Zeta-Jones) spends his time
collecting data about the social upheavals that lead to seismic shifts
which caused the US to fragment into islands many years before.  By way
of time travel, Flux is able to enter the world of 1999 through the
dreams of Vid (Michael George), to find subversive riot footage that was
the turning point in the downfall of society.  Vid's job with the
official (and government run) TV network NGZ is to film the riots for
broadcast to the masses, a job which his enlightened girlfriend Zola
(Susan Mansfield) feels is wrong and wishes he would quit.  Zola is just
one of many who have gained the ability to speak telepathically with
others, a power which those who possess it feel is the closest and most
personal way for people to communicate, especially when compared to the
cold and unfeeling internet. 
When Vid captures the footage that Flux is looking for, he soon realizes
what he has been participating in and no longer wants any part of it. 
He asks Zola to assist him in re-editing the footage for broadcast on
the Televisionary Terrorist Net Web, a renegade network that is
dispensing counter-information to the masses.  Through their efforts,
Vid hopes to once and for all awaken the population so they can see the
tyranny that the government has been committing for many years. 
Shot entirely on video, The Drivetime is a cautionary tale about the
dangers of the media in all forms and bears resemblance to the short
film La Jetee (and more closely 12 Monkeys, which was inspired by that
short film).  It's ironic that director Antero Alli chose to shoot his
film on video, especially since the film that Vid and Zola make ends the
film with a narration by Zola that asks humanity to turn off their TVs
and re-open their minds.  But the ultimate irony I suppose would be that
I'm reviewing his anti-internet film for an internet movie review site. 
Despite these ironies, The Drivetime is very adept at getting its point
across.  
Assisted and inspired by the Televisionary Oracle guru Rob Brezsny, The
Drivetime follows the idea that television is eating away at our minds. 
Brezsny states "[the mind is] being pummeled into dysfunction by the
numbing onslaught of generic and nihilistic images that endlessly flood
from the mass media".  He feels that the imagination is the most
important thing to keeping society together and the constant onslaught
on negative images from the media will eventually lead to the downfall
of society.  For anyone interested in learning more about Brezsny's
strange but thought provoking ideas about what should be done about
this, check out his web site at www.freewillastrology.com. 
Antero Alli has crafted a compelling look at what might happen to
society if we become over saturated with subversive images from the
media.  The performances are solid and the film's narrative never gets
too heavy-handed, which can oft times be the case when making a film
such as this.  Despite the limitations of the video format, Alli uses it
to its fullest advantages and the film actually benefits from it. 
Alli's use of color to delineate different time periods is also good,
with black and white normally showing the future and a sepia tone
usually reserved for the world of 1999.  [Editor's note: the
writer/director also has his own web site at www.paratheatrical.com] 
The Drivetime is available on VHS from www.b-movie.com. The film is
presented full frame and looks as crisp and clear as video can, save for
a few instances where the images were intended to look digitized or in
some other weird state.  Anyone who is interested in science fiction as
political allegory should check out The Drivetime, especially if the
subject matter is something you feel you might be interested in. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Pariah (1998)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Damon Jones, Dave Ward, David Lee Wilson, Aimee Chafin, Angela
Jones, Anna Padgett, Dan Weene, Ann Zupa, Brandon Slater, Jason Posey,
Chris Jarecki, Terence Washington, Tyrone Young, Orlando Estrada, Robert
Hargett, Elexa Williams, Tupelo Jerome, Ray Wadsworth, Kelly McCrary,
Joe Wood, Clint Curtis, Lynn Odell, Michael Turner, Candy Ass
Written and Directed by: Randolph Kret
Running Time: 105 minutes
Aggressive, bleak, and unrelenting film about an interracial couple,
Steve and Sam (Damon Jones and Elexa Williams respectively), who are
viciously attacked in a parking garage one night by a gang of
skinheads.  The skinheads beat Steve, then force him to watch as they
brutally rape his girlfriend over and over again.  When Sam kills
herself later that evening, Steve decides that the skinheads must be
taught a lesson.  Waiting seven months for the thuggish skinheads to
forget about the incident entirely, Steve shaves his head, dresses in
combat boots and suspenders, tattoos his flesh with Nazi symbols, and
tries to infiltrate the gang.  As he gets closer and closer to the
people who committed the horrible crime against his girlfriend, he
begins to learn just how vicious these people really are and starts to
question his own motives for violence.
Randolph Kret's script, based on two real life incidents that affected
not only his life but the life of the film's producer Shaun Hill, is an
affront on violence and intolerance.  The film causes its audience to be
subjected to such brutality and ignorance that one can't help but be
disgusted by the events presented within.  I've seen it said that this
is the film Fight Club should have been, but David Fincher's film was
trying to define a generation.  Kret's film is a wake up call to a
generation and his message is a powerful one.  If Fincher is the Kubrick
of our generation, then Kret is our D.W. Griffith (thematically
speaking).
There is not a single likable character in the film.  The skinheads are
obviously the most repulsive characters in the film, not only because of
their beliefs but because they are in a constant state of fury (not just
against other races but within their own circles).  The African-American
characters in the film are constantly shown as sexually assaulting drug
abusers who are always on a joyride looking for someone to accost.  Even
gay men get in on the act, locating the skinheads' lair and beating them
severely with lead pipes and other blunt objects.  The main character
Steve is also unlikable because of the person he becomes just to seek
out revenge.  What all of this comes down to is the simple message that
violence begets violence, and the constant clashes between factions will
do nothing but continue the endless cycle of violence inherent in our
society.
The cast of this film is absolutely remarkable.  Damon Jones shows a raw
energy that many actors can't seem to summon these days and his
performance seems nothing less than powerful.  His initial reaction to
hearing about his girlfriend's suicide is one of the most affecting
scenes I have ever seen in a film.  David Lee Wilson, who plays
(appropriately enough) David Lee is accurately evil as the second in
command skinhead who also makes extra money performing oral sex on other
men (an irony that seems lost on the other skinheads).  Wilson's
character is pure hatred and he brings out this hate perfectly.  Sadly,
actor Dave Ward, who portrays the character of Crew, will not be able to
follow up his excellent performance as he was the victim of a vicious
act of violence himself at the hands of a fellow actor during an
incident of road rage.  Ward showed immense promise and he will be
greatly missed.
Note: It is a shame that the filmmakers had to add a disclaimer to the
end of the film stating that neither they nor the musicians contributing
music for the film condone racism.  The message about hatred couldn't be
spelled out any more clearly than it is here, but there are those who
would probably find this film much more akin to a training video than a
condemnation.
There are no "winners" at the end of this film either.  No character
gets his or her comeuppance and the ending leaves us almost right where
we began.  Where American History X had redemption for most of its
characters, no such victories are in store for Pariah's band of twisted
souls.  It is this bleak ending that carries the film's most powerful
message: the message that, despite what you may be able to momentarily
do to put your own mind to rest, evil will still be with us (and in many
forms) and there is very little than can be done to eradicate it
entirely.
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Editor - The Jacksonville Film Journal
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
*** Warning - The following review contains spoilers ***
Cast: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O'Connell, Kim
Delaney, Tim Robbins, Elise Neal, Jill Teed, Jody Thompson, Bill Timoney 
Written by: Jim Thomas, John Thomas and Graham Yost 
Directed by: Brian DePalma 
Running Time: 115 minutes 
The first big event movie of 2000 turns out to be anything but.  Gary
Sinise stars as an astronaut who is removed from a Mars mission when his
astronaut wife, Maggie (Kim Delaney), becomes ill and passes away.  Don
Cheadle is then given the mission along with a Russian couple and a
young hotshot.  When a strange whirlwind shot from the top of a Mars
mountain range attacks the crew of the mission, Sinise and Robbins
convince their superior to let them, Neilsen, and O'Connell perform a
rescue mission for whatever crew might be remaining.  What they discover
on the surface of the planet will dramatically change their lives
forever (although no one watching the film will come away profoundly
affected). 
Before I ever saw the film, I was aware of the promotional campaign with
Dr. Pepper.  Every time I would see a bottle of the soft drink, the
Mission to Mars logo was emblazoned upon it.  Little did I know that the
plot would be taking a back seat to the product placement of the drink
and several other products.  Dr. Pepper saves the day at one point, and
a dream sequence/flashback features Jerry O'Connell shoving M&M's in our
face.  These are but a couple of the ridiculous examples of product
placement scattered throughout the film. 
Clichés are also the order of the day with Mission to Mars.  Dialogue
and character motivations are all lifted directly from countless other
science fiction films that have all done it better and with more style
(even Independence Day, which lifted all of IT'S premises from other
sci-fi films was better than this film, and I don't like Independence
Day).  Films like 2001:A Space Odyssey, The Abyss, and Close Encounters
of the Third Kind are all blatantly stolen from (and poorly at that). 
There is even a sequence where a rover is traveling through a canyon,
and I couldn't help but whisper "u'tinni" to myself and wait for a Jawa
to quickly hide in the rocks before the rover could get a glimpse of it. 
This film also features one of my all-time least favorite movie clichés:
the "he would have wanted you to have this" moment, where one character
gives another a trinket that yet another character is established as
constantly having (and is usually made fun of by the character who ends
up getting all sappy over it later on).  Scenes like these always bother
me when they come out of nowhere in regular films, but in a film as
cliché ridden as this, it is particularly irritating. 
Ennio Morricone's music is usually considered to be some of the best
stuff in the projects he works on, but here it is dreadfully
overbearing.  His music sounds like it came straight out of a Vincent
Price movie in certain scenes.  At other times his music is unbearably
over-dramatic.  One sequence involving a daring spacewalk rescue is
given a particularly cheesy sting when it is discovered that the
grappling hook device used for the rescue won't reach its intended
target. 
Mission to Mars is push button filmmaking to the greatest extreme. 
Events are set into motion that are obvious to anyone who has ever seen
a movie and seem like they are just there to evoke an emotional response
in the audience.  We are apparently supposed to be upset that Tim
Robbins character removes his helmet in deep space and kills himself to
save his wife, but I felt extreme boredom coupled with a twinge of
disinterest.  What makes it all worse is that fact that there is no real
reason that Robbins' character needs to turn himself into a popsicle,
except to invoke an emotional response (I could think of at least ONE
way to save him, and the NASA clowns in this film are supposed to be
"smarter" than I am). 
During the finale, when we are finally introduced to the translucent,
conehead, kitty-faced aliens that we ostensibly sprung from, we are
presented with some of the most ridiculously cartoonish CGI ever put to
film (just slightly worse than the plane crash at the end of Air Force
One or the Hell scenes in Spawn).  A brief history lesson about "where
we came from" is proffered, then Sinise is whisked away to be with "the
rest of our people" (he does this because his late wife proclaims in a
video he watches early on that "this is a chance to step foot where no
one else has"). 
>From the press I've been seeing this film receive, it is apparent that
Mission to Mars will be dying a quick death at the theater.  I'm sure
the first weekend or two will be huge, but once word gets out people
will stop going.  Let's just hope the upcoming Red Planet is better than
this and isn't hurt by the negativity this film is generating.  I'd
venture to say it won't be worse than this waste of time.  [PG]
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Isle of Lesbos (1997)
*** The following review contains some harsh language... but what did
you expect when you clicked on this title? ***
Cast: Kristen Holly Smith, Danica Sheridan, Alex Boling, Michael Dotson,
Sonya Hensley, Janet Krajeski, Sabrina Lu, Dionysius Burbano, Calvin
Grant, Jeff B. Harmon 
Written and Directed by: Jeff B. Harmon 
Running Time: 97 minutes 
"The thought of losing you makes me all vomity inside."  
  --- Blatz Balinski (Danica Sheridan) laments the fact that her lesbian
lover, April (Kristen Holly Smith), has just received a telegram from
her ex-fiance. 
Isle of Lesbos is an incredibly offensive musical comedy about April
Pfferpot (Smith), a resident of the small town of Bumfuck, Arkansas who
is about to get married to high school sweetheart and football hero Dick
Dickson (Michael Dotson).  When April gets extreme cold feet she runs
home, sticks a gun in her mouth, and pulls the trigger.  Instead of
killing herself, she is magically transported through her mirror into
the Isle of Lesbos, an alternate dimension where lesbians rule and no
men are allowed (except for Lance, the homosexual toilet
cleaner/slave).  
April loves her new home and friends, but Dick and her parents are not
so ready to give her up.  Mr. and Ms. Pfferpot (director Jeff B. Harmon
and Janet Krajeski) decide they need medical help so they enlist the aid
of Dr. Sigmoid Colon (also Jeff B. Harmon), who claims he can cure
homosexuality.  In actuality, Dr. Colon is homosexual as well and begins
his special "treatment" on Dick Dickson (unbeknownst to Dick).  
When April turns down Dick's demand for her to return to Bumfuck, he
decides to take matters in his own hands and attack the Isle of Lesbos
Rambo-style.  Instead of leveling the place he falls in love with Lance
(Alex Boling) and the two of them, along with April and her lover Blatz,
get married.  (Note to the filmmaker: Why did the character of Lance
make asides to the camera followed by silence that I'm assuming was
inserted for the purpose of waiting until the laughter of the audience
had subsided?)  April's parents, feeling like there is no recourse, call
in a favor to President Clinton and send a nuclear bomb (whose circuitry
inexplicably is made up of a homosexual performer) their way.  The bomb
is a dud thanks to the work of the "circuitry" and they re-wire it and
send it back to Washington D.C., destroying it.  Mr. and Ms. Pfferpot
give up trying to get their daughter back and instead decide to join her
as they have some alternative sexual practices of their own. 
I'm not sure if writer/director/co-star Jeff B. Harmon was purposely
trying to offend people because he believes in some of the ideas his
movie presents or if he was just going for cheap laughs.  Either way, he
manages to present some of the most offensive material I have ever seen
in a movie.  The film opens with a preacher running a small
African-American child out of town, and then later moves on to the
hanging of a Michael Jackson impersonator by the Ku Klux Klan (during a
jaunty musical number), preceded by remarks about "gays and straights
finally being able to put their differences behind them and work
together to hate others, such as the Jews".  If Harmon was merely trying
to point out how idiotic society can be, then I apologize for being so
harsh on elements of his film, but it is presented so mean spiritedly
that I can't help but feel like he had some serious intent. 
As for the entire central theme of the movie, I'm afraid that it's one
that I just don't get.  I tried to keep an open mind while watching it,
but the homosexual elements were just too prevalent for my tastes.  It
was hard enough to watch them bash other races and sexes without them
preaching about the virtues of being homosexual and accepted by
society.  How does one expect to be accepted if they are just as guilty
of non-acceptance?  I'm not prone to judging anyone and I believe that
people should be free to explore whatever avenues they wish free from
the scornful eye of society, but don't force your particular rhetoric
down my throat if you aren't going to show the same respect for my
preferences that you wish from me.  Again, maybe I'm missing the
satirical point that Harmon is trying to make, but if so, I think it
could have been handled a little more tactfully.  
As far as musical comedies go, Isle of Lesbos is no Trey Parker and Matt
Stone musical, but a good portion of the songs ARE maddeningly catchy. 
Despite the disturbing visuals, "Mom and Apple Pie" stuck with me for
the rest of the day.  Speaking of disturbing visuals, "Wedding Bells
Ain't Ringing" could have been a decent song, but the accompanying
visuals of spousal abuse are more harrowing than this film should be
displaying.  "I'm a Lesbian" (which is touted in the press release as
being particularly popular) is also pretty good, but a good portion of
that could be due to the stellar singing voice of Ms. Smith.  It's
mainly on her excellent vocals that my rating of this film is based. 
The other performers are decent, save for the Rosie O'Donnell like
performance given by Danica Sheridan.  I have no inherent problem with
her character; it is just her singing voice that leaves little to be
desired.  One particular musical number, "Lesbian Rock", was one of the
lowest points I have ever experienced in my film-going life thanks to a
strained and lackluster vocal job by Sheridan.  
The film ends about twenty minutes before the credits actually roll. 
The remainder of the running time is padded out with a few more songs
("Lesbian Rock" included) and the ridiculously presented anti-nukes
message tacked on to the end for no reason other than to make it a
feature length film.  Once the "Isle of Lesbos Reprise" was reached, I
felt the story had already been wrapped up well enough to end it all. 
Why was the film needlessly stretched out past its obvious end?  
Isle of Lesbos is available on videocassette from
www.indie-underground.com. The transfer is pretty clean (and all the
detail of the wrinkled cloth and paint backdrops are readily apparent)
and the film is letterboxed at approximately 1.85:1.  In many respects,
Isle of Lesbos has incredible cult potential (like a Rocky Horror for
the new millennium).  This film is by no means my cup of tea, but I know
there are those out there who will enjoy it.  If you think it might be
for you, then by all means seek it out.  I, on the other hand, will be
cleansing my palette with a good action film like Gladiator... 
Wait.  Aren't gladiator films considered to be... oh, never mind. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
AOL Instant Messenger: Widescreen25
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
Cast: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson, Lili Taylor, Bruce 
Dern, Virginia Madsen, Lisa Loeb
Written by: David Self
Directed by: Jan de Bont
Running Time: 112 minutes
Date Reviewed: August 4, 1999
Overblown remake of the 1963 Robert Wise film of the same name (based on 
Shirley Jackson's novel "The Haunting of Hill House") stars Lili Taylor as 
one of three "lab rats" that participate in a supposed "insomnia" study 
being initiated by Liam Neeson.  He is actually conducting a study on the 
causes of fear and why the human mind is still affected by it.  He drags the 
test subjects out to a foreboding mansion where all types of "creepy" CGI 
effects scare the cast and try the audience's patience.
I know this question has been posed before, but why do people keep remaking 
good movies?  The original was a great psychological horror film.  This new 
version is dull and very decidedly not scary.  In fact, I feel it is 
downright impossible to make a modern day PG-13 horror movie that is scary.  
Unless you find obvious computer generated special effects frightening, then 
there's nothing in this
film that will raise hackles.  I nearly fell asleep twice during the film, 
and probably would have if they guy two rows behind me didn't seem to have 
such a personal relationship with the characters that he felt he needed to 
discuss every decision they made with them as the film progressed.
It's sad to see such an amazing cast wasted so badly.  Owen Wilson spends 
most of the film wandering the halls of the house, and the script does no 
justice to his wonderful comic ability.  Catherine Zeta-Jones (always nice 
to look at) is given the woefully underwritten role of a bi-sexual insomniac 
that gets to run out of her bedroom perplexed every time some strange noise 
occurs.  Liam Neeson pops in from time to time to talk into his tape 
recorder and
attempt to convince the others that he has as much knowledge about what's 
going on as the rest of them do.  Finally, poor Lili Taylor, the center of 
the film, gets the brunt of the CGI effects thrown at her while everyone 
else gets to scream and try to rescue her.  Apparently, a subplot involving 
a tryst between Zeta-Jones and Taylor's characters was filmed but removed.  
That's too bad, because it might have lent some better characterization to 
the narrative.
This is Jan de Bont's second straight misfire (Speed 2:Cruise Control being 
the first).  When is he going to learn that bigger is not always necessarily 
better?  Robert Wise knew that when he made the original and the makes of 
The Blair Witch Project also knew that.  One should not approach a haunted 
house movie with a Twister mindset.
If de Bont and screenwriter David Self had let our minds fill in the blanks 
as to what was happening instead of showing us everything, it would have 
served to make the film terrifying.  What our mind fashions on it's own can 
be a thousand times more frightening than having having it completely led 
towards everything.  Apparently, yet another version of this story is being 
filmed under it's original title.  I certainly hope that this newer 
rendition will not be
hurt by the insanity of Jan de Bont's version and that it will retain the 
psychological impact that the original release had.  [PG-13]
Brian Matherly -- bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted 
without permission.


Title
Review for George of the Jungle (1997)
Call me a sucker for cheesy movies that admit their intentions from the
very beginning. Ever since the trailers for this movie were released, no
one could deny this movie was going to be the mecca of cheese. Let's just
say the movie delivers.
Almost a faithful translation of the original cartoon, replete with a new
rendition of the "George" theme by the Presidents of the United States of
America" and our good old faithful narrator, "George of the Jungle" offers
up the "so bad it's good" tradition of film-making.
The cast gives the usual cardboard performances common to most slapstick
children's films, especially Fraser who pulls a Keanu as George by not
really altering his voice to match his wild upbringing, but on the whole
the movie entertains. Fart jokes are not my style, though, and the last
fifteen minutes seem to be crammed with this type of humor. Only one
scene, involving yet another of my pet peeves: the face in the fecal
matter, actually comes off as being one of the better scenes in the film,
if not only for the scene that directly appears afterward.
Dana Olsen and Audrey Wells know their comedy fairly well, but their best
writing actually comes out of the relationship between Ursula and her best
friend (Kelly Miller). One almost longs to see a movie exclusively about
the two of them because the scenes with them seem to ring the truest.
The rest of the cast is rounded out by Thomas Haden Church (Wings, Ned and
Stacey) as the jerk boyfriend of Ursula who has a run in with the local
African law, John Cleese (A Fish Called Wanda, Monty Python and the Holy
Grail) as the voice of the ultra-intelligent Ape who must disguise his
true nature whenever Ursula is around, and Greg Cruttwell (2 Days in the
Valley) and Abraham Benrubi (Kubiack from Parker Lewis Can't Lose) as a
pair of bumbling hunters out to
find the mysterious "White Ape".
Be sure to stick around several minutes into the credits to catch a
rendition of "My Way" you won't soon forget.
Reviewed by: Brian Matherly (jbmath@worldnet.att.net)
